Public Disclosure Authorized

P olicy R esearch W orking P aper

Public Disclosure Authorized

4858

Poverty Decline, Agricultural Wages,
and Non-Farm Employment in Rural India
1983–2004

Public Disclosure Authorized

Public Disclosure Authorized

WPS4858

Peter Lanjouw
Rinku Murgai

The World Bank
Development Research Group
Poverty Team
March 2008

Policy Research Working Paper 4858

Abstract
The authors analyze five rounds of National Sample
Survey data covering 1983, 1987/8, 1993/4, 1999/0,
and 2004/5 to explore the relationship between rural
diversification and poverty. Poverty in rural India
declined at a modest rate during this period. The authors
provide region-level estimates that illustrate considerable
geographic heterogeneity in this progress. Poverty
estimates correlate well with region-level data on changes
in agricultural wage rates. Agricultural labor remains
the preserve of the uneducated and also to a large extent
of the scheduled castes and scheduled tribes. Although
agricultural labor grew as a share of total economic
activity over the first four rounds, it had fallen back to
the levels observed at the beginning of the survey period
by 2004. This all-India trajectory masks widely varying
trends across states. During this period, the rural nonfarm sector grew modestly, mainly between the last two
survey rounds. Regular non-farm employment remains
largely associated with education levels and social status

that are rare among the poor. However, casual labor and
self-employment in the non-farm sector reveal greater
involvement by disadvantaged groups in 2004 than in
the preceding rounds. The implication for poverty is
not immediately clear—the poor may be pushed into
low-return casual non-farm activities due to lack of
opportunities in the agricultural sector rather than being
pulled by high returns offered by the non-farm sector.
Econometric estimates reveal that expansion of the nonfarm sector is associated with falling poverty via two
routes: a direct impact on poverty that is likely due to a
pro-poor marginal incidence of non-farm employment
expansion; and an indirect impact attributable to
the positive effect of non-farm employment growth
on agricultural wages. The analysis also confirms the
important contribution to rural poverty reduction
from agricultural productivity, availability of land, and
consumption levels in proximate urban areas.

This paper—a product of the Poverty Team, Development Research Group—is part of a larger effort in the department to
analyze processes and causes of poverty reduction in the developing world. Policy Research Working Papers are also posted
on the Web at http://econ.worldbank.org. The authors may be contacted at rmurgai@worldbank.org and planjouw@
worldbank.org.

The Policy Research Working Paper Series disseminates the findings of work in progress to encourage the exchange of ideas about development
issues. An objective of the series is to get the findings out quickly, even if the presentations are less than fully polished. The papers carry the
names of the authors and should be cited accordingly. The findings, interpretations, and conclusions expressed in this paper are entirely those
of the authors. They do not necessarily represent the views of the International Bank for Reconstruction and Development/World Bank and
its affiliated organizations, or those of the Executive Directors of the World Bank or the governments they represent.

Produced by the Research Support Team

Poverty Decline, Agricultural Wages,
and Non-Farm Employment in Rural India:
1983-2004
Peter Lanjouw (World Bank) and Rinku Murgai (World Bank)*

*

We are grateful to participants of the workshop “Household-Level Linkages Between Farm and Non-farm
Rural Income Generation Activities” held at the Food and Agricultural Organization, October 11-12, 2007,
and to participants at the Ninth Annual Conference on Indian Economic Policy Reform at Stanford
University in June, 2008. Additional thanks are due to two anonymous referees and to Mukesh Eswaran,
Subashish Gangopadhyay, Himanshu, Hanan Jacoby, Anjini Kochar, Ashok Kotwal, Aprahajit Mahajan,
Martin Ravallion, Abhijit Sen, Forhad Shilpi, TN Srinivasan, Tara Vishwanath, Wilima Wadhwa and
Nobuo Yoshida. We thank Pinaki Joddar for research assistance. The views in this paper are those of the
authors and should not be taken to reflect those of the World Bank or affiliated institutions. All errors are
our own.

I. Introduction
Twenty years ago the common image of India was one of a vast, populous
country blessed with a vibrant democracy but afflicted by a highly rigid social structure,
low levels of human development, widespread and deep consumption poverty, and
doomed to eternal economic underperformance.

Recent decades have seen some

significant changes to that image. Following economic reforms first introduced during
the 1980s and continued in subsequent years, India has raced towards the top of the world
league tables in terms of aggregate economic performance. There is little doubt that the
newly unleashed Indian economy has settled into a new, more rapid, growth trajectory.
While future crises may unfold and growth may falter, a return to the sclerotic old days
seems unlikely. Indeed, on the economic front the country now faces problems that are
linked to success: moving to the next generation of reforms to sustain growth and
expanding the benefits of rapid growth—across sectors, regions, and people.
Economic growth is only a means, not an end. It is critical that rising incomes
and new opportunities ushered in by a reinvigorated economy translate into welfare
improvements. Historically, India’s performance in poverty reduction has been rather
disappointing. As a share of the population, poverty during the pre-reform decades
declined at a pace that was steady, but slow. In the face of ongoing overall population
growth it proved very difficult to significantly reduce the total number of people
suffering from staggering levels of material deprivation.

A question of central

importance has thus been whether the newly galvanized Indian economy heralds also a
decisive break with the past in the domain of poverty reduction. This question has
engaged a large community of researchers and analysts during recent decades.
This paper focuses on rural areas and presents evidence from household surveys
to ask whether, and how, rural living standards have improved significantly over time.
Estimates of rural poverty from four large-scale surveys carried out in 1983, 1987/8,
1993/4 and 2004/5 indicate that there has been modest progress but with no suggestion of
an acceleration in the pace of poverty reduction in rural India alongside the acceleration
of economic growth during this period. There is considerable variation both across and
within states which we exploit to explore mechanisms underlying the observed patterns
of poverty reduction.
2

The paper confirms the historically close association between poverty and
agricultural wage employment, and finds that there has been no decline – until the most
recent period of 1999/00 to 2004/05 – in the share of the adult population with primary
occupation in agricultural wage labor. As a result, changes in poverty are found to
correlate well with changes in agricultural wages at the region (within state) level. There
is little evidence of broad, across the board, acceleration in agricultural wage growth
during the 1990s. In a majority of regions, real agricultural wage growth between 1993/4
and 2004/5 is lower than what was observed during the 1980s. The period post-1999
witnessed a sharp deceleration in the growth rate of agricultural wages, and in some
regions real wages actually declined.
A sector that is often looked to for impetus in rural poverty reduction is the rural
non-farm sector. This sector accounts for nearly half of rural household income in a
significant number of states in India. The sector is highly heterogeneous and can be
crudely divided into three sub-sectors comprising: regular salaried non-farm
employment; casual wage labor in the non-farm sector; and non-agricultural selfemployment activities. The former sub-sector is most clearly associated with relatively
high and stable incomes, while the latter two are more heterogeneous and can comprise
both productive as well as residual activities. NSS data indicate that during the reference
period there are signs of modest growth, on aggregate, in the size of the non-farm sector.
While overall employment levels in the non-farm sector remained remarkably stable
between 1983 and 1999/0, there is evidence that this has picked up between 1999/0 and
2004/5.
However, throughout this period the poor are hardly represented at all in the
regular non-farm sector and are only slightly more involved in non-farm selfemployment. Only in the case of casual wage-labor in the non-farm sector do the poor
appear to have a somewhat greater involvement in the non-farm sector than do the nonpoor.
Despite evidence of only modest poverty reduction or diversification out of
agriculture at the national level, National Sample Survey (NSS) data reveal a great deal
of heterogeneity in these outcomes at the sub-state region-level. This regional variation
can be exploited to study econometrically the relationship between poverty, agricultural

3

wage labor employment and non-farm employment in rural India. The analysis reveals
that poverty is associated in a complex way with the non-farm sector. First the data
indicate that, controlling for agricultural wages, agricultural productivity, land
availability and consumption levels in nearby urban centers, expansion of non-farm
employment is directly associated with poverty decline.

We suggest that this is

consistent with the idea that while at early levels the non-poor may have been more
successful at “capturing” non-farm income earning opportunities, there is some evidence
that “marginal incidence” of further expansion of the sub-sector is pro-poor. We show
that the pro-poor impact of the non-farm sector is attenuated in settings where education
levels are particularly low. Second, the analysis further shows that expansion of the nonfarm sector appears to put pressure on wage rates in agriculture (again, less strongly so in
settings where education levels are particularly low). Rising agricultural wage rates are,
in turn, strongly correlated with rural poverty reduction. Thus, there is some evidence
consistent with an important indirect impact of the non-farm sector on rural poverty.
The evidence assembled in this study from the NSS surveys thus offers some
empirical support to the view that the period between 1983 and 2004/5 was one of
gradual economic diversification out of agriculture and limited poverty reduction in rural
areas. But it is important, as well, to acknowledge the limitations to the analysis here.
The analysis stops in 2004/5 and we are unable to say what has happened since that
survey year. The analysis is also somewhat partial in its examination of sources of rural
livelihoods.

Notably, we are not able to carry out a very detailed analysis of the

relationship between poverty and agricultural production, or on the evolution of
agricultural output over time. This omission is due to lack of detailed data in the NSS
surveys on farm production and household incomes.
In the remaining sections of this paper we turn in greater detail to the empirical
underpinnings of the basic story outlined above. In Section II we consider the evolution
of poverty in India.

Section III looks at agricultural labor and agricultural wages.

Section IV documents the size and evolution of the non-farm sector between 1983 and
2004/5, and Section V exploits a region-level panel dataset across three of our four
surveys to bring together the arguments of the preceding sections and Section VI offers
some concluding comments.

4

II. Poverty 1983 – 2004/5
Comparable estimates of poverty for the 38th, 43rd, 50th and 61st NSS rounds
suggest that at the all-India level, rural poverty declined modestly from 37.2 percent to
28.4 percent between 1993/4 and 2004/5, a rate of less than 1 percentage point per year
(Table 1). This is nearly the same as the decline from 46.9 to 37.2 percent that occurred
during the preceding 10 years (between 1983 and 1993/4). There is little evidence of a
striking acceleration of poverty reduction in rural India alongside the well-documented
acceleration of economic growth in India during this period. 1
Table 1 also reveals that changes in poverty at the national, and even state, level
mask considerable heterogeneity in the evolution of poverty across regions. Indeed,
while poverty declined in most regions, it is estimated to have risen between 1993 and
2004/5 in roughly one in six of the regions considered in our analysis.
There has been a great deal of controversy surrounding the pace, and even
direction, of poverty reduction during the 1990s due to problems of comparability of the
1999/00 NSS 55th round with earlier surveys. 2 In a precursor to this paper, Kijima and
Lanjouw (2003 and 2005) proposed a number of adjustments at restoring comparability
across the 50th and 55th rounds, and suggested that poverty reduction in rural areas was
very modest between 1993/94 and 1999/00, a finding that was also suggested by Sen and
Himanshu (2004a and 2004b). Results in these papers suggest that the bulk of poverty
reduction between 1993/4 and 2004/5 is likely to have taken place in the latter half of the
decade, between 1999/00 and 2004/5. This presents a conundrum, because as shown in
the next section, poverty reduction in rural India has historically been closely associated
with agricultural wages and the latter half of the decade was witness to a sharp
deceleration in agricultural wage growth. It has led some researchers (Himanshu 2007;
Dev and Ravi, 2007) to suggest that the non-farm sector may have be a key factor behind
the poverty decline during the 1990s.
1

In a recent contribution, Deaton (2007) suggests that official statistics may be understating the rate of
rural inflation during this time period with the implication that the 2004/5 poverty estimates might be
understating the true incidence of poverty in that years. His analysis suggests that the rate of poverty
decline between 1993/4 and 2004/5 discussed above may thus be overstated by 3 percentage points.
2
See the collection of papers (Deaton, 2003a, Datt, Kozel and Ravallion, 2003, Sundaram and Tendulkar,
2003) in the Economic and Political Weekly (January 25, 2003), and the update in Deaton and Kozel
(2006).

5

We consider in the next section trends in employment in agricultural labor, and in
agricultural wages, to see to what extent these provide corroborating evidence to the
poverty estimates above.

III. Agricultural Employment and Agricultural Wages
Historically, employment in casual agricultural wage labor has been shown to be
strongly correlated with poverty in rural India (Lal, 1976, Singh, 1990, Lanjouw and
Stern, 1998, Sharma 2001, Sundaram, 2001, Himanshu, 2004). More recent data suggest
that this is still the case. The “odds” of being employed in agricultural wage labor fall
monotonically as one rises in the consumption distribution. And there is only slight
evidence of this association weakening over time (Table 2). Other dimensions of wellbeing such as education levels and caste status have also been shown to be strongly and
inversely correlated with agricultural wage employment (Kijima and Lanjouw, 2005).
Agricultural wage employment continues to employ over 20% of adult males, and
has expanded steadily since 1983, until a recent decline between 1999/00 and 2004/05
(Table 3). For women, although far fewer are judged to be economically active, the
importance of agricultural labor employment is even more pronounced.

There is

considerable heterogeneity among states, with several states with higher agricultural
employment shares in 2004/5 than, say, in 1987/8 (Appendix Table 1).
This evidence suggests that agricultural wage employment and agricultural wages
in particular, can serve as a valuable window on living standards in rural areas. As
suggested by Deaton and Drèze (2002), agricultural wages can be viewed not only as
useful proxies of poverty but can also be seen as indicators of poverty in their own right
insofar that they capture the reservation wages of the rural labor force.
Trends in state-level daily agricultural wages estimated from NSS data suggest
much heterogeneity in levels and trends across states. During the 1980s, in 8 states, real
wages declined (Table 4). 3 This pattern accords with the widely-held notion that 1987/8
3

Agricultural wage data are available in India from a variety of sources. Himanshu (2004) provides a
detailed assessment of the different sources available, and argues that calculation of agricultural wages
directly from the NSS surveys is not only feasible, but quite possibly yields more reliable figures than are
available from alternative sources. He cautions against the calculation of agricultural wage rates from the
1987/8 NSS round, arguing that the unit record data do not produce wage rates that are readily comparable
to wage estimates for that year published by the NSS itself. We have chosen to calculate and report the

6

was a poor agricultural year. Beyond 1987/8 and until 1990/0, real wages rose in all
states. However, between 1999/0 and 2004, there was a significant deceleration in real
wage growth, from 2.6 percent per year between 1993/4 and 1999/0 to 1.6 percent per
year in the period that followed. In some states real wages actually decline. Only in
Assam, Orissa and UP is there evidence of real wages rising more rapidly between
1999/0 and 2004/5 than during the preceding two survey rounds.
This deceleration in wage growth, juxtaposed against potentially more rapid
decline in poverty during the 1999/0 to 2004/5 has led to renewed attention to the nonfarm sector as a source of poverty reduction. We turn to trends in non-farm employment
in the next section.

IV. Non-Farm Employment
As described in Section I, the rural non-farm sector is widely looked to as a
source of momentum for rural growth and poverty reduction.

Employment patterns in

the non-farm sector have been widely scrutinized for evidence of economic dynamism in
rural areas. Visaria and Basant (1993) carefully examine National Sample Survey and
Census data and document a clear increase in the share of non-agricultural employment
in the rural workforce during the 1980s, with the trend more clearly evident among males
than among female workers. In addition, the evidence appears to point to a more rapid
expansion of tertiary sector employment rather than of secondary sector employment,4
and that the bulk of employment growth is of a casual nature, rather than permanent.
Surprisingly, this expansion appears to have slowed during recent years. Unni and
Raveendran (2007) suggest that long-term employment growth in rural areas slowed
down substantially between 1993/4-2004/5 relative to 1983-1993.
Fisher, Mahajan and Singha (1997) conclude that 18-25% of rural employment
occurred in the non-farm sector at the beginning of the 1990s. An important observation
made in this study was that approximately one-fifth of total rural non-farm employment
1987/8 estimates but acknowledge that they may be less reliable than estimates for other survey years. In
the econometric analysis in Section V, we do not include the 1987/8 data due to these comparability
problems.
4
Secondary sector refers to manufacturing, utilities, construction and mining. The tertiary sector includes
activities such as retail trade, hotels and restaurants, financial services, transport and communication, public
administration, education, health, and community services.

7

was estimated to be generated by public sector services, primarily public administration
and education (see also Sen, 1996). Other important sectors in terms of employment
shares were found to include retail trade, personal services, construction, wood products
and furniture, over-land transport, and textiles. While manufacturing activities are often
the first that come to mind when discussing the non-farm sector, the study showed that
services are easily as important.
A study by Acharya and Mitra (2000) draws on multiple rounds of National
Sample Survey data (spanning the period 1984-1997), and also two rounds of the
Economic Census (corresponding to 1990 and 1998) to ask whether the positive non-farm
employment trends of the 1980s have continued through the 1990s. They find little
evidence of further expansion. At the all-rural India level they find that employment in
the secondary and tertiary sectors grew from about 22% of the workforce in 1983 to
about 25% by 1987-8. They found no evidence of further growth during the 1990s; the
last NSS survey they examined (“thin” round for 1997) indicated an employment rate of
about 24%.

The authors note considerable variation across states in the degree of

occupational diversification (with states such as Kerala, Punjab, Haryana, Gujarat and
Tamil Nadu clearly more diversified than others), but observe no clear evidence of
growth in non-farm employment rates during the 1990s occurring in any state other than
Kerala (Acharya and Mitra, 2000). 5 Unni and Raveendran (2007) suggest that non-farm
self-employment and non-farm casual wage employment sector grew slightly more
rapidly between 1993/4-2004/5 than during the preceding decade. However, they point
to evidence of a less rapid growth rate in regular non-farm employment during this
period.
An important recent paper by Foster and Rosenzweig (2003) provides a theoretical
exposition of how the non-farm economy interacts with the farm economy - building on
the great heterogeneity of non-farm activities in rural areas, and highlighting the
importance of general-equilibrium relationships. The authors argue that a key distinction
has to be made between traded and non-traded goods and services, and they emphasize
the significance of wage and salary employment in non-farm activities as opposed to the

5

In his exhaustive examination of NSS data between 1977/8 to 1999/0 Vaidyanathan (2001) observes
many of the same trends reported here.

8

self-employment activities that have traditionally been the focus of attention. Foster and
Rosenzweig (2003 and 2004) analyze NCAER data from roughly 250 villages covering
the period 1971, 1982 and 1999 to study the evolution of the non-farm economy in rural
India. These data permit the authors to calculate non-farm incomes, and they show that
non-farm income shares have increased significantly during this time period. 6 Foster and
Rosenzweig suggest that a growing rural based export-oriented manufacturing sector can
be expected to have an important pro-poor impact in rural India, possibly more
significant than that which can be expected from agriculture-led growth. This follows
from their observation that rural diversification tends to be more rapid and extensive in
places where agricultural wages are lower and where agricultural productivity growth has
been less marked. Although the Foster and Rosenzweig study employs different data
definitions and conventions than NSS-based studies (including the present study) their
evidence is suggestive of a very significant rise in non-farm employment shares during
their study period. They suggest that by 1999 about 44% of males aged 25-44 had
primary employment in the non-agricultural sector by 1999. These figures appear higher
than what NSS data suggest (although the figures cannot be directly compared as they
refer to different age groups and different employment definitions).

An important

question is whether expansion of the non-farm sector observed by Foster and Rosenzweig
occurred steadily during their reference period, or whether it took place in fits and starts.
As others have already suggested, and we shall see further below, NSS data indicate that
between 1987/8 and 1999/0 there was little expansion of non-farm employment in rural
areas.
A recent study by Eswaran, Kotwal, Ramaswami and Wadhwa (2007) pursues the
question of whether expansion of the non-farm sector is likely to influence agricultural
wage rates. This could be an important route through which rural non-farm employment
influences rural poverty, particularly if, as suggested by Foster and Rosenzweig (2003
and 2004) non-farm enterprises have been establishing themselves in areas where
agricultural wages are low (and therefore rural poverty is high). The analysis by Eswaran
6

Foster and Rosenzweigh (2003b) suggest that non-farm income shares grew from just under a third in
1982 to nearly 50% in 1999. A study by Lanjouw and Shariff (2002) based on a different NCAER dataset
for 1993 calculated a rural non-farm income share of 37%. This is suggestive of steady growth of the nonfarm sector throughout the 1980s and 1990s – a trend which NSS employment data do not appear to
corroborate (see below).

9

et al (2007) draws on NSS data in combination with total factor productivity data from
other sources. They find that agricultural wage growth during the period 1983-1999 has
been driven for the greatest part by changes in agricultural productivity and that the
contribution of the non-farm sector to real wage increase is likely to have been no greater
than a quarter.
In Section V below we shall revisit the arguments offered by Foster and
Rosenzweig (2003 and 2004) and those by Eswaran et al (2007), regarding the role of
agricultural wage labor markets, and the farm versus the non-farm sector, in
understanding rural poverty reduction. We turn first to descriptive analysis of NSS data
in order to gain a sense of overall dimensions of the non-farm sector.

Non-Farm Employment Shares
Non-farm employment is divided into three categories: regular employment
(generally salaried), casual employment (daily wage) and self-employment/own
enterprise activities. This distinction is intended to reflect to some extent the very
different characteristics of non-farm activities in rural areas – characteristics that are
important in terms of defining the desirability of such jobs. A general typology that
appears to resonate with findings from many village studies is that regular non-farm
employment is typically highly sought-after in rural areas as it is associated not only with
high incomes, but crucially also with a degree of stability. Non-farm self-employment
activities can be both residual, last resort options as well as high return, productive,
activities, but whether they are of the former or latter variant generally depends on the
amount of capital resources that can be brought to the activity. Casual non-farm wage
employment is generally thought to be less demeaning to a worker than agricultural wage
labor, but returns may be only marginally higher and the nature of the work may be both
physically demanding as well as hazardous (construction, rickshaw pulling, industrial
workshops, etc.). 7

7

Note, there is potential overlap in our categories of casual, self-employment and regular non-farm
employment – a person may be doing more than one type of activity in the course of the year. In our
econometric analyses below we classify individuals on the basis of Principal Usual Status, the activity they
are engaged in for the major part of the year preceding the survey, including both their principal and main
subsidiary activity.

10

Employment shares in non-farm activities have grown since 1983, reaching their
peak in 2004/5 (Table 3), with state level employment shares ranging 22-32% (Appendix
Table 1). In each respective survey year, wage and salary employment has tended to
account for about 11-16% of overall employment, with the balance made up by selfemployment/own-enterprise activities. There are large differences across states in terms
of the importance of the non-farm sector. In Kerala, non-farm employment shares were
as high as 77% in 2004/5, and the importance of regular employment in this state grew
significantly over time (from under 25% to nearly 40%). In states such as Madhya
Pradesh, Bihar, Chattisgarh and Maharashtra, the sector has still to make its presence felt.
At the all-India level, there has been a modest expansion of this sector over time.
However, importantly, it has become the main source of employment growth in rural
areas. In the 1980s, of the nearly 40 million additional jobs generated, the majority (6 out
of every 10) were in the farm sector. Between 1993/4 and 2004/5, non-farm employment
growth had outstripped agriculture, as 6 of every 10 new jobs in rural India were
generated in the non-farm sector.

The largest increase in incremental employment

attributed to the non-farm sector took place between 1999/0 and 2004/5.

Non-Farm Employment and Consumption Quintiles
The distinction between regular, casual and self-employment in the non-farm
sector is well reflected in Tables 5a-5c, documenting the relationship between non-farm
employment and consumption quintiles in each of the respective survey years. 8 In all
five survey years, regular non-farm employment occurred disproportionately in the top
quintile of the per capita consumption distribution (Table 5a). While overall employment
shares in regular non-farm employment hovered around 6% throughout this period, the
relative frequency of such employment in the top quintile was two or more times higher,
while in the bottom quintile it was below 3%.
Overall employment shares in casual non-farm activities are only slightly higher
than for regular non-farm employment shares (Table 5b). But the distribution across
consumption quintiles is quite different. Casual wage employment in the non-farm sector

8

Lanjouw and Shariff (2003) observe very similar patterns across income quintiles in NCAER data for
1993/4.

11

generally occurs most frequently in the lowest quintiles of the consumption distribution.
The odds of employment in casual non-farm wage labor are less than one in the top
quintiles and greater than one in the bottom three quintiles. There is little evidence of
systematic change in these patterns over time.
Non-farm self-employment activities tend to be more evenly distributed over the
consumption distribution, indicating that both poor households as well as rich households
are involved in such activities (Table 5c). On balance, however, the odds of selfemployment in the non-farm sector are slightly higher in the top three quintiles of the
consumption distribution suggesting that such activities are more frequent among the
relatively better off. There is some suggestion that in the 2004/5 survey year the gradient
between self-employment in the non-farm sector and consumption quintiles has
weakened somewhat. While in this year the percentage of self-employed in the non-farm
sector is still lowest in the bottom quintile, the odds of participation are higher than in the
other survey years and analogously, the odds are somewhat lower in the top quintile.
The patterns of employment observed across the consumption distribution also
tend to be repeated in terms of other dimensions of well-being such as education and
caste status (Kijima and Lanjouw, 2005). Education levels and social status are generally
highest among those with regular non-farm employment while casual non-farm
employment is more common among the illiterate and scheduled caste and scheduled
tribe households. Over time there is some suggestion that casual non-farm employment
has become slightly more strongly correlated with higher education levels. This is
consistent with gradually rising education levels in rural India over time, and a tendency
for those with some education to crowd out the uneducated in casual non-farm
employment (see further below).

Non-Farm Employment Probabilities
Of course, education and social status are not just of interest as intrinsic indicators
of welfare, but are also likely to play an instrumental role in determining income or
consumption levels – influencing for example, individuals’ access to non-farm
opportunities.

The relationship between occupational choice and household

characteristics is explored more systematically in Appendix Tables 3-7 on the basis of

12

multinomial logit models of occupational choice for each survey year (Appendix Table 2
provides descriptive statistics of the explanatory variables employed in these models).
We employ the multinomial logit model to explore the individual and household
characteristics that are associated with the probability of non-farm employment in rural
India (see Greene, 1993 for a useful exposition of this model). We consider seven broad
occupations in rural areas: agricultural casual wage employment; regular farm
employment; cultivation; non-farm regular employment; non-farm casual wage (daily
wage) employment; non-farm own-enterprise activities; and other (plus non-working). 9
Our “explanatory” variables comprise a selection of individual and household
characteristics. At the individual level we consider the age, educational status, and
caste/religious status of each person.
At the household level, we have information on the size of the household to which
each person belongs and the household’s per-capita landholding. The latter might proxy
wealth and contacts, and thereby provide some indication of the extent to which
individuals are better placed to take advantage of opportunities in the non-farm sector. 10
The multinomial model requires that a particular occupational category be
designated as the numeraire against which all results should be compared. We have
chosen agricultural wage labour as the comparison group. This implies that parameter
estimates for the categories which are included should be interpreted not as correlates of
employment in a given occupational category, but as indicators of the strength of
association of a particular explanatory variable with the respective occupational category
relative to the same explanatory variable with agricultural labour. To ease interpretation
we consider direct parameter estimates and then produce some derived tables that
summarize the impact of specific explanatory variables.
The multinomial logit models confirm that relative to agricultural wage labor, the
probability of employment in any of the three non-farm sub-sectors is consistently lower
for those who belong to the scheduled castes and for those with no education. This
9

We concentrate in this analysis on reported principal occupation of males, and are unable to consider, as a
result, the set of issues associated with combining farm with nonfarm activities during the course of, say, an
agricultural year (with its associated peak and slack seasons).
10
It is often noted that the market for the purchase and sale of land is rather thin in rural India, as opposed
to the market for landuse – tenancy (see Jayaraman and Lanjouw, 1999). Landholdings may therefore be
reasonably exogenous in the kind of models estimated here.

13

pattern remains quite stable the five survey years. These findings are summarized in
Tables 6 and 7 presenting the predicted probabilities of employment in the various
occupations at mean values of the explanatory variables. For example, the first cell in
Table 6 indicates that in 1983 the predicted probability of employment in agricultural
labor would be about 34.6% if all individuals were scheduled castes or scheduled tribes
(with education levels and other characteristics corresponding to the overall average in
the population). This probability would fall to 23.4% if their caste status were switched
to non-SC/ST. It is important to recognize that these are stylized probabilities – in reality
SC/ST’s would have education levels and landholdings well below the national average
as well. Table 6 indicates that the effect of caste status on regular non-farm employment
probabilities appears to operate indirectly through the differential education and
landholdings of SC/ST’s instead of directly. Holding these other characteristics constant
(at their national average), predicted employment in regular non-farm employment is not
markedly lower for SC/STs. With casual and self-employment in the non-farm sector,
evidence of caste differences are more readily discernable. In general, there is little
evidence of marked changes in the role of social status in determining occupational status
over time.
Table 7 confirms the clear association of education with employment in non-farm
activities. Predicted probabilities of regular non-farm employment in all five survey
years increase markedly with education levels (at mean values of other characteristics),
while they fall sharply in the case of agricultural labor, and more moderately in the case
of casual non-farm employment. There is little evidence of a strong role for education in
self-employment activities.

Once again, this is possibly the consequence of the

heterogeneity in the kind of self-employment activities that take place.
Finally, the multinomial models in Appendix Tables 3-7 also suggest that the
probability of employment in regular non-farm activities and non-farm self-employment
is significantly higher (relative to agricultural labor) for those with higher per-capita
landholdings. Lanjouw and Stern (1998) argue, on the basis of a detailed village study in
Uttar Pradesh, that information networks and ability to pay bribes are important
determinants of access to the better-paying and more attractive non-farm jobs. It is
possible that per-capita landholdings are proxying such assets here.

14

V. Non-Farm Employment, Poverty, and Agricultural Wages: A Regional Analysis
We conclude the analysis in this paper by drawing on the considerable variation
across NSS regions and over time to bring together the three strands of the analysis:
poverty, agricultural labor and non-farm employment. We construct an NSS region-level
panel dataset based the 1983, 1993/4, and 2004/5 rounds of the NSS surveys. These three
rounds have generally been met with broad endorsement as to underlying data quality,
reliability and comparability. They span a period of broadly 20 years and, given that there
are on average some 60 regions that make up the major states in India, also reflect
considerable spatial heterogeneity. Our panel data set is based largely on data derived
from the NSS survey and aggregated to the NSS region level, but we have also appended
information on region-level agricultural productivity to the dataset, built up from districtlevel indicators of annual production, acreage, and prices of over 40 major crops
available from official publications.

11

The database brings together non-farm

employment, poverty and agricultural wage outcomes at the region-level with data on
non-farm wages, urban consumption levels, per-capita landholdings and average
education outcomes.

Framework
Our approach in this section is largely descriptive. We start with a regional
analysis of the correlates of non-farm employment, asking to what extent the farm and
non-farm sectors are to be seen as complements or as substitutes.

We distinguish

between types of non-farm employment (regular, casual and self-employment) as well as
broad sectoral categories.

We are interested in particular to see whether there are

complementarities between non-farm employment growth and education outcomes.
We then turn to an analysis of the correlates of rural poverty and of rural
agricultural wage rates. Our approach here builds on a framework developed in Datt and
Ravallion (1998) in which a reduced-form specification for poverty is expressed as a
11

We are grateful to Himanshu for sharing his estimates of NSS region-level yields with us. These
estimates are based on annual district-level data on crop production and acreage reported by the Ministry of
Agriculture. Yields are measured as the value of total production per hectare of land devoted to over 40
main crops in the districts comprising an NSS region. Triennium averages of production and acreage
around the survey year are used to smooth out annual fluctuations.

15

function of agricultural productivity and other variables such as stocks of skilled labor or
inflationary shocks. Because of short-run stickiness or other imperfections in labor
markets, a reduced form for poverty includes agricultural wages and prices as an
additional regressor. By controlling for wages and prices, Datt and Ravallion isolate a
“direct” effect of agricultural productivity on poverty reduction from general equilibrium
indirect effects that are felt through changes in wages and prices. Datt and Ravallion
(1998) apply this framework using 24 rounds of NSS data covering a 35-year period
between 1958 and 1994. In the present study our data span only three time periods, but
we bring additional spatial variation to the analysis.
We build on the Datt and Ravallion framework by looking also at the role of the nonfarm sector in reducing rural poverty in India. A natural starting point would be to
include a measure of non-farm productivity in the reduced form specification for poverty.
Data limitations, however, mean that such a relation cannot be estimated.

Some

estimates of non-farm productivity are available, but these are only at the state-level and
restricted to the organized manufacturing sector which leaves out the vast majority of
rural non-farm jobs. Given the absence of non-farm productivity data, we proxy nonfarm growth by employment in the non-farm sector. Given the suggestion that access to
non-farm sector may be rationed on the basis of characteristics that do not favor the poor
– noted in the previous section where we examined individual-level probabilities of nonfarm employment – we consider inclusion of non-farm employment as a separate
determinant of poverty reduction. Since overall non-farm employment may well contain
important endogenous elements, we also consider separately the impacts of regular,
salaried employment which is arguably less likely to suffer from endogeneity since a
large share of regular jobs are in the public sector which is less affected by the local
economy. In addition, we can enquire whether expansion of the sector is pro-poor on the
margin.

To that end, we present evidence on the marginal incidence of non-farm

employment expansion based on an approach described in Lanjouw and Ravallion
(1998).
Because our poverty regressions reveal a strong association between poverty
reduction and agricultural wage rates we turn next to a question asked by Eswaran et al
(2008), namely whether there is evidence of non-farm employment growth on

16

agricultural wages. To the extent that growth in non-farm employment leads to a general
tightening of agricultural wage markets, one might expect to see a rise in agricultural
wages in locations where the non-farm sector is expanding. This would then point to an
indirect effect of non-farm employment on poverty reduction via its impact on wages.

Results: Correlates of Non-Farm Employment Growth
In Tables 8a and 8b we estimate the relationship between non-farm employment
growth and changes in agricultural productivity. The first panel in each table reports the
unconditional relationship, net of period effects captured by time dummies for 1993/4
and 2004/5. Non-farm employment growth is measured as the log of average number of
non-farm workers per working age adult in each NSS region, and agricultural
productivity growth is the log of yield as measured by the value of production of 43 main
crops per hectare. The second panel of each table adds four additional explanatory
variables: the log of region-level average casual non-farm wages; the log of average per
capita urban consumption per region; region-level log per-capita landholdings; and the
log of the region-level working population that has not completed primary school
education. Motivation for the inclusion of these variables is as follows: Foster and
Rosenzweig (2003 and 2004) emphasize that non-farm enterprises may be attracted to
locations where reservation wages are low; we introduce casual non-farm wages as a
proxy for such reservation wages. Average per capita urban consumption per region is
included as a possible proxy for market size for rural non-farm products and services.
Per capita landholdings are intended to capture land abundance in the region – thereby
proxying scope for agglomeration externalities.

Finally our education variable is

intended to capture the extent to which low education levels in rural area may act as a
deterrent to rural non-farm employment growth.
Tables 8a and 8b are distinguished from each other only with respect to the way
in which they control for unobserved location characteristics. In Table 8a, we estimate
our models with state-level fixed effects. This implies that we allow both temporal
variation as well as within-state region level variation to determine our parameter
estimates. Given that we have far more spatial variation in our data than temporal
variation, parameter estimates from the state-level fixed effects specifications are driven

17

largely by cross sectional variation. Table 8b replaces the state-level fixed effects with
region-level fixed effects. In this specification we are able to control for unobserved
region-level characteristics and variation arises largely from region-level changes over
time.
In the first panel of Table 8a we can see that agricultural productivity is strongly
associated with non-farm employment. Controlling for state-level characteristics, as well
as year effects, we see that regions with higher agricultural productivity are associated
with greater non-farm employment. This pattern holds true for all non-farm employment
taken together, but also for sub “sectors” of the non-farm sector: regular and casual
employment, although not self-employment. Considering sectors of activity, it appears
that agricultural productivity is particularly strongly associated with growth in the nonfarm manufacturing and commerce sectors, but not construction.

When additional

controls are added, the positive relationship between agricultural productivity and nonfarm growth is significant only in the case of regular non-farm employment. Moreover,
agricultural productivity growth is associated with a decline in construction employment.
This last observation is somewhat puzzling, but it may be that construction “booms”
occur at the expense of agriculture, in the sense that they involve the conversion of land
out of agriculture into residential, retailing or industrial/manufacturing uses. In most
models, urban consumption levels are strongly and positively associated with non-farm
employment.

Greater land abundance tends to reduce non-farm employment.

An

important finding is that regular non-farm employment tends to be lower in those regions
where the share of poorly educated workers is greater. Regular non-farm employment
thus seems to be particularly dependent on an educated workforce.
In broad terms thus, when we control for unobserved state but not region-level
characteristics, we find that regions with higher agricultural productivity are also those
where non-farm employment is greater. This finding is consistent with the thesis that
there exist positive linkages from the agricultural sector to the non-farm sector (see for
example Mellor and Lele, 1973).
This conclusion is tempered however, when we control for region-level fixed
effects rather than just state-level fixed effects. We find now that overall non-farm
employment, and also non-farm self-employment is negatively related to agricultural

18

productivity.

This suggests that the non-farm sector, particularly non-farm self-

employment, may function more as a safety net – acting to absorb labor in those regions
where agricultural productivity has been declining – rather than being promoted by
growth in the agriculture sector. The dissonance between the findings in Table 8a and 8b
(top panel) can be understood in terms of the fact that in the former Table, cross-sectional
variation across regions within states is allowed to determine the parameter estimate on
yield. Such cross-sectional variation confirms that the non-farm sector tends to be more
present in regions which are also productive agriculturally. The findings in Table 8b,
however, suggest that growth in the non-farm sector appears to be more a response to
declining agricultural productivity than a consequence of agricultural growth.
When we examine the fuller regional fixed effects specification (lower panel of
Table 8b) the negative relationship between non-farm employment and yields is no
longer significant. Apart from a strongly significant and positive parameter estimate on
the dummy for 2004, indicating a markedly higher presence of non-farm employment in
2004 – in all “sectors” (with the notable exception of regular non-farm employment) –
the only other statistically significant parameter estimate is on our human capital proxy in
the regular non-farm employment model – indicating that regular non-farm employment
growth has been slower in those regions where education levels have not improved. Note
that although the region-level fixed effects specifications do not result in a large number
of highly significant findings, the explanatory power of these models is markedly higher
than of the state-level fixed effects models in Table 8a. This indicates that there are
important region-level unobserved characteristics, and that models that fail to control for
these adequately may draw conclusions about the drivers of non-farm employment
growth that are non-robust.

Results: Correlates of Poverty Decline
We turn next to our second set of models and examine the relative role of
agricultural productivity and non-farm employment as potential determinants of poverty
reduction in rural areas. Table 9 presents results for four models divided into two sets
depending on whether a state-level or region-level fixed effects specification is estimated.
In contrast to what was observed in the models presented in Tables 8a and 8b, parameter

19

estimates are generally stable across the state-level and region-level fixed effects
specifications. Statistical significance also tends to survive the application of the more
demanding region-level fixed effects specifications (with the exception of the year
dummies). There is evidence of a strong and negative impact of agricultural wage
growth on rural poverty.

This confirms the widely noted relationship between

agricultural wages and poverty in rural areas of India. Agricultural productivity, urban
per capita expenditure and land abundance are also all strongly associated with lower
rural poverty across all specifications.
A notable exception to the general pattern of robust parameter estimates pertains
to the impact of the rural non-farm sector on poverty. In the state-level fixed effects
specification, non-farm employment is positively associated with rural poverty (an effect
that is attenuated by the interaction of non-farm employment with the share of the
working age population with education below the primary completion level).

This

finding essentially says that within states, regions with more non-farm employment tend
also to be those with higher poverty – a pattern consistent with the notion put forward by
Foster and Rosenzweig (2003 and 2004) that non-farm enterprises may locate in settings
where reservation wages are lower. When the same model is estimated with region-level
fixed effects, however, the relationship is overturned: non-farm growth is associated with
a reduction in poverty, and this effect is attenuated the larger the share of the working
population with low education levels. Thus when we focus specifically on changes over
time and abstract away from cross sectional variation across regions, poverty decline is
observed to occur most rapidly in regions where the non-farm sector has grown (with the
effect being weaker in regions where education levels are low).
We have argued above that inclusion of the non-farm employment variable in our
reduced form poverty model may be defensible in a context where access to non-farm
employment is rationed. Our earlier analysis of the correlates of non-farm employment at
the individual level (summarized in Tables 6 and 7) indicated that characteristics such as
caste, education, and wealth (proxied by land owned) may indeed influence access to
non-farm employment, particularly the more highly remunerative regular non-farm jobs.
In general we noted that the poor were more likely to possess characteristics that

20

prevented them accessing non-farm jobs, particularly regular non-farm jobs. This raises
the question of how non-farm employment growth might help to reduce poverty.
One possible explanation for our findings from the region-level fixed effects
specification centers around the distinction between the average “incidence” of non-farm
employment and the marginal incidence of such employment. Tables 5a-5c reveal that
on average the poor are highly under represented among those with non-farm jobs. The
average odds of regular non-farm employment are particularly low for the poorest
quintile of the rural population (0.027 relative to 0.072 in 2004 – Table 5a). These
patterns are echoed in the analysis of non-farm employment probabilities summarized in
Tables 6 and 7. However, what such quantitative patterns fail to reveal is how these odds
would change as the non-farm sector grew. Lanjouw and Ravallion (1998) consider this
question in the context of public spending programs in rural India. They note the
possibility of early capture by the rich at the onset of a particular public spending
program which gradually becomes diluted and more pro-poor as the program continues to
grow: the rich get first “dibs” on the public program, but then become satiated, and
subsequent expansion of the program trickles down to the less well off. In such a setting
the marginal incidence of the public program may be much less regressive than the
average incidence (see Lanjouw and Ravallion 1999 for further discussion).
Lanjouw and Ravallion (1999) propose a method for estimating marginal
incidence based on cross-sectional variation at the region level. Essentially they propose
estimating five models, corresponding each to a particular quintile of the overall rural per
capita consumption distribution, in which the region (and quintile) – specific incidence of
a program is regressed on the overall state-level average incidence of the program. A
different parameter estimate obtains for each quintile, and can be interpreted as the
marginal odds of program participation (see Lanjouw and Ravallion, 1999, for details).
We apply this method to assess the marginal odds of non-farm employment in rural India,
using the 2004 NSS survey data.
Table 10 presents our results. We consider first, in Table 10a, the incidence of
regular non-farm employment. On average, just under 4% of working adults in the
poorest quintile are employed in the regular non-farm sector. This compares to over 9%
of the overall adult working population, and translates into average odds of regular non-

21

farm employment of 38% – the poorest are roughly two-fifths as likely to have regular
non-farm employment as the population on average. In contrast the richest quintile has
average odds of regular non-farm employment of 187% – the rich are nearly twice as
likely to have such employment as the population on average. We next ask what happens
when we allow for the possibility that the incidence of non-farm employment may
change as the overall regular non-farm sector expands. Based on the approach outlined
above we find that the incidence of regular non-farm employment is more pro-poor on
the margin than on average (marginal odds of 0.53 for the poorest quintile rather than
average odds of 0.38). Similarly, we cannot reject that the marginal odds of regular nonfarm employment for the richest quintile is the same as for the population on average
(0.84 is not statistically significantly different from 1.00), while the average odds of
employment by the rich in this sector is 1.87. These findings suggest that as the non-farm
sector expands, there is a decline in the degree to which access by the poor is restricted;
gradually more of the poor are able to find such employment, and the sector gradually
becomes less exclusively the preserve of the rich.
Table 10b indicates that the average incidence of casual wage non-farm
employment is less markedly pro-rich than regular non-farm employment. Indeed, the
average odds of casual wage non-farm employment for the bottom two quintiles is
greater than one, indicating that the poor are more likely to be employed in this subsector than the population on average. Nonetheless, our marginal incidence estimates
continue to indicate that on the margin the non-farm sector is more pro-poor than would
be suggested by the average incidence: the marginal odds of casual wage non-farm
employment for the bottom quintile is 1.50 compared to an average incidence of 1.39.
Growth in this sub-sector would thus be likely to engage a disproportionate number of the
poor. Whether this would translate into a reduction in poverty would of course depend
on incomes from this non-farm sub-sector. On average non-farm casual wages are not
terribly high and so the increased engagement of the poor in this sector may not result in
a marked decline in poverty. Because regular non-farm incomes are typically a good deal
higher than alternative incomes for the poor (such as agricultural wages) the higher
marginal incidence in this sub-sector does suggest that poverty would respond as regular
non-farm opportunities expanded. Finally, Table 10c shows that the marginal odds of

22

non-farm self-employment are not much different from the average odds, and are
nowhere significantly different from one, indicating that expansion or contraction of this
particular sub-sector would not fall disproportionately on one or other segment of the per
capita consumption distribution.

Results: Correlates of Agricultural Wages
Our final set of models looks at the correlates of agricultural wage rates. Our
intention here is to probe the general equilibrium impact of the non-farm sector on
poverty. Table 11 presents two sets of models, with again each set respectively applying
a state- or region-level fixed effects specification. Within each set we distinguish the
models on the basis of the non-farm control variable, considering first total non-farm
employment and then just regular non-farm employment.
In the state-level fixed effects specifications (models 1 and 2) there is evidence of
a positive and significant relationship between agricultural productivity and agricultural
wages. However, there is no evidence of any significant relationship between the nonfarm sector and agricultural wages. When we allow for an important role for crosssectional variation in driving parameter estimates, therefore, we see that agricultural
wages rates are higher in those regions with greater agricultural productivity – controlling
for unobserved state-level characteristics.
A different conclusion is reached when we turn to the region-level fixed effects
specification. When we allow only region-level changes to drive parameter estimates, we
cannot reject that growth in yields has no impact on agricultural wages, while growth in
the non-farm sector is clearly associated with higher agricultural wages. Again the
impact of the non-farm sector on wages is attenuated if education levels are particularly
low. Presumably low education levels prevent agricultural workers from accessing nonfarm jobs, and expansion of this sector then results in less tightening of the agricultural
wage labor market.

23

VI. Concluding Comments

This study has examined five quinquennial rounds of National Sample Survey
data, covering the period 1983 to 2004/5, to enquire into the extent and speed of poverty
decline in rural India during the 1990s, and to explore the inter-relationship between rural
poverty, agricultural wage labor employment and the rural non-farm economy. Our main
findings can be summarized as follows.
We suggest that while there is evidence of declining poverty between 1983 and
2004/5, the pace of reduction has been rather slow. Consistent with earlier studies we
find evidence that employment over time in agricultural labor has not shown a clear
declining trend, and we find that employment in agricultural labor is strongly correlated
with low consumption levels. This finding is consistent with the notion that agricultural
labor remains a “last resort” option for the rural population – as has often been suggested
in the literature. Real wages have been rising over time (continuing a trend that started in
the early 1970s), but the rate of increase appears to have slowed substantially between
1999/0 and 2004/5.
Consistent with other researchers we document a sizeable non-agricultural sector
in rural India. While this sector appears to have grown in step with overall population
growth, we suggest that the non-farm sector only modestly increased its share of total
employment during the 1990s. This latter finding appears to be robust within NSS data.
However, studies based on other data sources have suggested that growth in the non-farm
sector has been more pronounced (Foster and Rosenzweig, 2003a, b)..
We suggest that non-farm employment comprises three sub-sectors: regular
employment, casual employment and self-employment. We document that regular nonfarm employment is associated with high consumption levels, but show that those with
low education levels, low social status, and low wealth are not well-represented in this
sub-sector. Education, social status and wealth seem less relevant for employment in
casual non-farm employment, although there is some evidence that lower levels of
education are helpful in gaining access to casual non-farm employment.

Self-

employment in the non-farm sector seems to be particularly heterogeneous, comprising
both last resort as well as productive activities. On balance, involvement in this sub-

24

sector also appears to require some education, wealth and social status- perhaps less
strongly so in the most recent survey year.
While the picture for India as a whole suggests that there has been no acceleration
in the rate of poverty decline or in the rate of diversification out of agriculture, we are
able to draw on the marked variation across NSS regions and over time, to pursue the
impact of rural diversification on rural poverty. Tentative econometric estimates from a
region-level panel dataset covering our reference period indicate that poverty is
associated in a complex way with the non-farm sector. Controlling for agricultural
wages, agricultural productivity, land availability and consumption levels in nearby urban
centers, expansion of non-farm employment is directly associated with poverty decline.
We suggest that this is consistent with the idea that, while at early levels the non-poor
may have been more successful at “capturing” non-farm income earning opportunities,
there is some evidence that over time, further expansion of the sub-sector is pro-poor.
We show that the pro-poor impact of the non-farm sector is attenuated in settings where
education levels are particularly low. Second, the analysis further shows that expansion
of the non-farm sector appears to put pressure on wage rates in agriculture (again, less
strongly so in settings where education levels are particularly low). Rising agricultural
wages rates are, in turn, shown to be strongly correlated with rural poverty reduction.
Thus we have presented evidence consistent with an important indirect, as well as direct,
impact of the non-farm sector on rural poverty.
In conclusion, policy makers aiming to alleviate poverty should continue to
explore options for promoting the non-farm sector. This study suggests that efforts
should focus on the promotion of non-farm opportunities that do not impose barriers to
entry. These efforts can be expected not only to directly raise the income levels of the
poor who gain access to such jobs. They are also likely to contribute to poverty reduction
by raising the wages received by those who remain employed as agricultural laborers.

25

References
Acharya, S. and Mitra, A. (2000) “The Potential of Rural Industries and Trade to provide
Decent Work Conditions: A Data Reconnaissance in India”, SAAT Working Paper, South
Asia Multidisciplinary Advisory Team, International Labour Organisation New Delhi.
Bhalla, S. (1993) ‘The Dynamics of Wage Determination and Employment Generation in
Indian Agriculture’, Indian Journal of Agricultural Economics Vol(48), No. 3, July-Sept:
449-470.
Datt, G. and Ravallion, M. (1997) ‘Why Have Some Indian States Done Better than
Others at Reducing Rural Poverty?’ Economica 65: 17-38.
Datt, G. and Ravallion, M. (2002) ‘Why has Economie Growth Been More Pro-Poor in
Some States of India than Others?’ Journal of Development Economics 68(2002), 381400.
Datt, G., Kozel, V. and Ravallion, M. (2003) ‘A Model-Based Assessment of India’s
Progress in Reducing Poverty in the 1990s’ Economic and Political Weekly, January 25,
2003.
Deaton, A. (2001) ‘Computing Prices and Poverty Rates in India: 1999-2000’, Princeton,
Research Program in Development Studies, processed. Available at
http://www.wws.princeton.edu/~rpds.
Deaton, A. (2003a) ‘Adjusted Indian Poverty Estimates for 1999-2000’ Economic and
Political Weekly, January 25, 2003.
Deaton, A. (2003b) ‘Prices and Poverty in India: 1987-2000’ Economic and Political
Weekly, January 25, 2003.
Deaton, A. (2003c) ‘Regional Poverty Estimates for India: 1999-2000’, mimeo,
Research Program in Development Studies, Princeton University.
Deaton, A. (2007) ‘Price Trends in India and their Implications for Measuring Poverty’,
mimeo, Research Program in Development Studies, Princeton University.
Deaton, A. and Drèze, J.P. (2002) ‘Poverty and Inequality in India: A Reexamination’
Economic and Political Weekly, September 7, 2002.
Deaton, A. and Tarozzi, A. (2000) ‘Prices and Poverty in India’, Princeton, Research
Programme in Development Studies, processed. Available at
http://www.wws.princeton.edu/~rpds.

26

Deaton, Angus and Kozel, Valerie (forthcoming) 'Data and Dogma: The Great Indian
Poverty Debate' in Deaton , A. and Kozel, V. (eds) Data and Dogma: the Great Indian
Poverty Debate New Delhi, India: MacMillan.
Eswaran, M, Kotwal, A., Ramaswami, B and Wadhwa, W. (2007) ‘How Does Poverty
Decline? Suggestive Evidence from India, 1983-1999’, mimeo, University of British
Columbia, March 2007.
Fisher, T., Mahajan, V. and Singha, A. (1997) The Forgotten Sector: Non-Farm
Employment and Enterprises in Rural India, Intermediate Technology Publications,
1997.
Foster, A. and Rosenzweig, M. (2003) ‘Agricultural Development, Industrialization and
Rural Inequality’, mimeo, Brown Univeristy and Harvard University.
Foster, A. and Rosenzweig, M. (2004) ‘Agricultural Productivity Growth, Rural
Economic Diversity, and Economic Reforms: India, 1970-2000’, Economic Development
and Cultural Change 52, 509-542.
Greene (1993) Econometric Analysis, 2nd Edition (New Jersey: Prentice Hall Inc.)
Himanshu (2004) ‘Wages in Rural India’, mimeo, JNU University, New Delhi.
Jayaraman and Lanjouw (1999) ‘Poverty and Inequality in Indian Villages’, World Bank
Research Observer Vol 14, No.1.
Kijima, Y. and Lanjouw, P. (2003) ‘Poverty In India During the 1990s: A Regional
Perspective’, Policy Research Working Paper No 3141, The World Bank, Washington
D.C.
Kijima, Y. and Lanjouw, P. (2005) ‘Economic Diversification and Poverty Decline in
Rural India’, Indian Journal of Labor Economics, 48(2)
Lal, D. (1976) ‘Agricultural Growth, Real Wages and the Rural Poor in India’ Economic
and Political Weekly 12 (20) May 14.
Lanjouw, P. and A. Shariff (2002) ‘Rural Non-Farm Employment in India:Access,
Incomes and Poverty Impact’, NCAER Working Paper WP020006, February.
Lanjouw, P. and Stern, N. (eds) (1998) Economic Development in Palanpur Over Five
Decades (Oxford: Oxford University Press).
Lanjouw, P. and Ravallion, M. (1998) ‘Benefit Incidence, Public Spending Programs and
the Timing of Program Capture’ World Bank Economic Review, 13(2): 257-273.
Mellor, J. and Lele, U. (1973) ‘Growth Linkages of the New Food Grain Technologies’
Indian Journal of Agricultural Economics 18 (1): 35-55.
27

Ravallion, M. and Datt, G. (1996) ‘How Important to India’s Poor is the Sectoral
Composition of Economic Growth?’, World Bank Economic Review 10(1): 1-25.
Ravallion, M. and Datt, B. (1999) ‘When is Growth Pro-Poor? Evidence from the
Diverse Experience of India’s States’, Policy Research Working Paper WPS 2263, the
World Bank.
Sen, A. and Himanshu (2004a) ‘Poverty and Inequality in India: Getting Closer to the
Truth’, mimeo, JNU Univeristy, New Delhi.
Sen, A. and Himanshu (2004b) ‘Poverty and Inequality in India I’ Economic and
Political Weekly 39(38), September 18.
Sen, A. (1996) "Economic Reforms, Employment and Poverty: Trends and Options"
Economic and Political Weekly, Vol XXXI, No. 35-37.
Sarmah, S. (2002) ‘Agricultural Wages in India: A Study of States and Regions’, The
Indian Journal of Labour Economics, Vol 45, No. 1, 2002.
Sharma, H.R. (2001) ‘Employment and Wage Earnings of Agricultural Labourers: A
State-wise Analysis’, The Indian Journal of Labour Economics, Vol 44, No.1.
Singh, I. (1990) The Great Ascent: The Rural Poor in South Asia (Washington D.C.:
Johns Hopkins University Press).
Sundaram, K. (2001) ‘Employment and Poverty in 1990s: Further Results from NSS 55th
Round Employment-Unemployment Survey, 1999-2000’, Economic and Political
Weekly, August 11, 2001.
Sundaram, K. and S. Tendulkar (2003a) ‘Poverty Has Declined in 1990s: A Resolution of
Comparability Problems in NSS Consumer Expenditure Data’ Economic and Political
Weekly, VolXXXVIII, No 4.
Sundaram and Tendulkar (2003b) ‘Poverty in India in the 1990s: Revised Results for AllIndia and 15 Major States for 1993/4’, Economic and Political Weekly, November 15,
2003.
Tarozzi, A. (2001) ‘Estimating Comparable Poverty Counts from Incomparable Surveys:
Measuring Poverty in India’ Princeton University, Dept. of Economics, processed.
Unni, J. and G. Ravendran (2007) ‘Growth of Employment (1993-2004/5): Illusion of
Inclusiveness?’, Economic and Political Weekly, January 20, 2007.
Vaidyanathan A. (2001) ‘Employment in India, 1977-8 to 1999/0: Characteristics and
Trends’ Journal of Indian School of Political Economy Vol 13, No. 20.

28

Visaria, P. and Basant, R. (1993) Non-Agricultural Employment in India: Trends and
Prospects, (New Delhi: Sage).
Virmani, A. (2004) ‘The Simple Economics of General Election 2004’, mimeo,
International Council for Research on International Economics, New Delhi, India.

29

NSS Region
Andhra Pradesh
Costal
Inland Northern
South-Western
Inland Southern
Assam
Plains Eastern
Plains Western
Hills
Jharkhand
Bihar
Northern
Central
Gujarat
Eastern
Plains Northern
Plains Southern
Dry areas
Saurashtra
Haryana
Eastern
Western
Himachal Pradesh
Karnataka
Coastal Ghats
Inland Eastern
Inland Southern
Inland Northern
Kerala
Northern
Southern
Chattisgarh
Madhya Pradesh
Vindhya
Central
Malwa
South
South Western
Northern
Maharashtra
Coastal

Table 1: Poverty in Rural India 1983-2004
1983
1987/8
1993/4
26.8
21.0
15.9
21.9
17.2
17.1
24.1
21.5
13.9
38.7
19.0
20.9
46.8
40.8
13.0
43.3
39.4
45.2
36.3
35.1
37.1
47.8
42.9
50.4
46.0
26.7
41.4
65.6
52.8
62.3
64.7
54.2
56.6
66.2
54.8
58.6
62.3
53.2
53.6
29.4
28.3
22.2
53.1
34.2
25.5
24.8
25.9
23.3
29.4
22.8
26.2
37.0
46.9
26.4
13.4
18.3
12.2
22.4
15.3
28.3
23.9
20.4
32.5
20.4
9.3
22.1
17.8
16.7
30.4
36.2
32.6
30.1
18.4
12.7
9.0
29.3
23.4
14.5
35.8
35.1
29.6
42.8
37.7
37.9
39.8
29.3
25.4
46.0
37.3
27.8
35.5
23.9
23.8
50.7
46.7
44.4
49.3
40.1
39.2
60.9
36.4
36.5
45.7
44.5
49.4
48.1
37.4
27.8
51.1
51.3
46.4
58.7
50.9
67.8
26.9
22.9
16.6
46.0
40.9
37.9
29.2
29.8
15.2

30

2004/5
10.5
7.0
11.0
22.4
11.5
22.1
20.7
22.9
23.2
46.2
42.6
41.6
44.1
18.9
26.1
21.6
17.9
25.0
2.7
13.2
12.7
14.1
10.5
20.7
20.3
5.1
15.1
27.4
13.2
21.1
7.5
40.8
36.8
48.0
50.4
25.1
49.4
23.8
22.9
29.6
26.0

Inland Western
Inland Northern
Inland Central
Inland Eastern
Eastern
Orissa
Coastal
Southern
Northern
Punjab
Northern
Southern
Rajasthan
Western
North-Eastern
Southern
South-Eastern
Tamil Nadu
Coastal Northern
Coastal
Southern
Inland
Uttarakhand
Uttar Pradesh
Western
Central
Eastern
Southern
West Bengal
Himalayan
Eastern Plains
Central Plains
Western Plains
All-Rural

38.4
52.4
51.1
58.6
46.6
68.5
58.1
80.8
75.2
14.4
16.8
11.8
38.6
33.2
33.5
61.0
48.0
56.7
65.0
58.2
54.8
47.4
25.1
48.1
34.1
55.0
54.3
68.9
63.8
73.4
63.5
59.8
66.8
46.9

31.5
45.5
48.3
49.5
45.6
58.7
48.5
83.0
61.0
12.8
10.6
16.0
33.3
27.9
28.8
61.1
31.3
46.3
60.7
39.5
51.3
30.4
13.2
43.6
32.2
44.2
50.5
64.8
48.8
33.9
60.5
43.8
47.6
39.6

24.9
47.3
49.8
49.1
49.3
49.8
45.3
68.8
45.9
11.7
7.3
17.4
26.4
25.3
17.9
46.3
33.9
32.9
44.3
20.8
37.2
22.2
24.8
43.1
29.3
50.2
48.8
67.4
41.2
58.4
47.5
31.4
40.7
37.2

9.5
37.9
42.6
33.4
47.1
46.9
27.4
72.7
59.1
9.0
4.4
14.6
18.3
22.5
12.7
30.4
10.9
23.0
28.1
13.5
21.7
26.7
40.6
33.3
24.1
30.1
41.4
38.9
28.4
20.1
42.9
20.1
24.8
28.4

Notes: Poverty rates are based on official poverty lines. Estimates for Bihar, UP and MP prior to 2000 are for split state.
1999/00 poverty rates not reported because of non-comparability with other rounds. Source: Authors’ calculations from
NSS 38th, 43rd, 50th, and 55th NSS rounds.

31

Table 2: Agricultural Wage Employment and Consumption Quintiles, 1983-2004
Per Capita
Consumption
Quintiles
Poorest 20%
2nd Quintile
3rd Quintile
4th Quintile
Richest 20%
Total

% of working adult population with primary employment in agricultural wage labor
(average “odds”)
1983
1987/8
1993/4
1999/00
2004/05
49.6 (1.54)
47.4 (1.50)
51.2 (1.49)
52.0 (1.48)
42.7 (1.42)
38.4 (1.19)
38.5 (1.21)
40.2 (1.17)
43.8 (1.25)
36.2 (1.20)
31.4 (0.98)
31.1 (0.98)
34.0 (0.99)
35.4 (1.01)
31.1 (1.03)
25.4 (0.79)
26.2 (0.83)
29.3 (0.85)
28.7 (0.82)
25.7 (0.85)
18.3 (0.57)
17.8 (0.56)
20.0 (0.58)
17.0 (0.48)
18.7 (0.62)
32.2 (1.00)
31.7 (1.00)
34.3 (1.00)
35.2 (1.00)
30.1 (1.00)

Notes: Consumption quintiles are based on the distribution of per capita expenditures, adjusted for cost of living differences
across states using the deflator implicit in the official poverty lines. Working adult population is defined as 15-60 year olds who
were engaged in work (excluding unemployed seeking work) for a relatively longer time during the year preceding the survey,
i.e., based on the NSS definition of Principal Usual Status. Sources: Authors’ calculations based on Schedule 10.0 NSS survey
rounds.

Table 3: Distribution of Occupations in Rural India, 1983-2004

1983

1987

Males
1993

1999

2004

1983

Females
1987
1993
1999

2004

Agriculture:
Casual labor
Cultivator
Regular
Nonfarm:
Regular
Casual labor
Self-employed

24.3
38.4
3.0

24.3
35.0
2.5

25.7
34.8
1.1

26.0
31.4
1.1

21.8
31.9
0.8

17.0
16.4
0.5

15.8
16.0
0.8

16.7
13.6
0.2

17.2
13.2
0.3

15.5
14.7
0.2

6.4
5.2
10.9

6.6
7.6
10.3

6.6
6.8
11.6

6.8
8.1
12.1

7.3
9.6
14.4

1.0
1.9
3.2

1.1
3.7
2.4

1.1
1.8
3.0

1.2
1.8
3.5

1.6
2.0
4.1

Not working

11.8

13.7

13.3

14.6

14.3

60.1

60.3

63.5

62.9

62.0

Notes: Non-farm workers are defined as workers in sectors other than agriculture by using the industry code. Regular workers
are those who earn salary or wages on a regular basis (i.e., not on the basis of daily or periodic renewal of work contract).
Casual workers are those who wages on the basis of daily or periodic work contracts. Self-employed are persons who operate
their own enterprises, or are engaged in a profession or trade on own-account or with partners. Sources: Authors’ calculations
based on Schedule 10.0 NSS survey rounds.

32

Table 4: Levels and Trends in Agricultural Wages
Agricultural Wage (Rs/day, 1993 prices)

AP
Assam
Bihar
Chhattisgarh
Gujarat
Haryana
HP
Jharkhand
Karnataka
Kerala
Maharashtra
MP
Orissa
Punjab
Rajasthan
TN
UP
Uttarakhand
WB

1983

1987

1993

1999

2004

198387

10.9
18.3
12.3
8.9
13.9
29.0
8.3
11.8
9.0
27.0
8.9
9.4
9.6
30.5
15.7
10.1
12.5
31.2
14.8

10.6
22.1
14.0
10.8
17.5
19.1
15.0
17.6
8.9
28.0
12.0
8.4
8.0
27.3
18.6
10.0
13.0
24.2
17.0

15.0
25.0
15.7
12.0
20.0
30.0
30.0
18.0
15.0
35.0
15.0
15.0
15.0
42.9
25.0
20.0
20.0
30.0
22.5

18.5
25.3
21.8
14.9
21.5
38.3
42.3
22.8
18.1
51.4
15.5
18.0
15.0
43.8
31.1
24.9
21.3
32.3
25.5

16.5
35.4
24.1
14.7
22.4
43.7
56.2
24.1
19.6
57.1
15.6
17.7
17.8
43.7
33.2
27.0
28.9
32.2
25.7

-2.6
20.9
14.2
20.8
25.7
-34.1
81.8
48.3
-0.9
3.6
34.1
-10.6
-16.3
-10.4
18.5
-0.5
4.3
-22.5
15.4

Percent Change
1987- 1993- 199993
99
2004
41.2
13.2
11.9
11.2
14.4
57.0
100.0
2.6
67.8
25.2
25.3
77.9
87.6
57.0
34.4
99.6
53.6
24.1
32.1

23.6
1.3
38.9
24.2
7.4
27.7
41.1
26.4
20.3
47.0
3.5
20.0
0.1
2.1
24.4
24.3
6.7
7.8
13.4

-10.9
39.7
10.2
-1.3
4.4
14.1
32.8
5.7
8.4
11.1
0.7
-1.9
18.6
-0.1
6.7
8.7
35.6
-0.3
0.8

Notes: State-specific median agricultural wages reported in the table are calculated by first estimating an
average agricultural wage for each 15-60 year old person who reports wages for any manual work related to
cultivation, including ploughing, sowing, transplanting, weeding, harvesting, and other cultivation activities
in the week preceding the survey. State-specific CPIs for agricultural laborers are used for adjusting cost of
living differences over time. Sources: Authors’ calculations based on the 38th, 43rd, 50th, 55th, and 61st NSS
Schedule 10.0 surveys.

33

Table 5a: Regular Non-Farm Employment and Consumption Quintiles 1983-2004/5
Per Capita
% of working population with primary employment in regular non-farm
Consumption
employment (average “odds”)
Quintiles
1983
1987/8
1993/4
1999/00
2004/5
Poorest 20%
2nd Quintile
3rd Quintile
4th Quintile
Richest 20%
Total

2.3 (0.40)
3.6 (0.62)
4.7 (0.80)
6.3 (1.08)
11.5 (1.99)
5.8 (1.00)

2.3 (0.37)
3.0 (0.50)
4.4 (0.72)
6.5 (1.07)
13.4 (2.21)
6.1 (1.00)

2.1 (0.34)
3.1 (0.49)
4.5 (0.71)
6.7 (1.08)
13.7 (2.20)
6.2 (1.00)

2.2 (0.33)
3.4 (0.52)
4.4 (0.67)
7.0 (1.06)
15.6 (2.38)
6.6 (1.00)

2.7 (0.38)
3.6 (0.50)
5.1 (0.71)
7.3 (1.01)
15.5 (2.15)
7.2 (1.00)

Table 5b: Casual Non-Farm Wage Employment by Quintile 1983-2004/5
Per Capita
% of working population with primary employment in casual non-farm
Consumption
employment (average “odds”)
Quintiles
1983
1987/8
1993/4
1999/00
2004/5
Poorest 20%
2nd Quintile
3rd Quintile
4th Quintile
Richest 20%
Total

Per Capita
Consumption
Quintiles
Poorest 20%
2nd Quintile
3rd Quintile
4th Quintile
Richest 20%
Total

5.9 (1.07)
6.0 (1.09)
6.0 (1.08)
5.2 (0.94)
4.6 (0.84)
5.5 (1.00)

9.4 (1.06)
8.9 (1.01)
9.5 (1.07)
9.4 (1.06)
7.4 (0.83)
8.9 (1.00)

7.3 (1.04)
8.1 (1.16)
7.1 (1.02)
6.8 (0.98)
5.8 (0.83)
7.0 (1.00)

8.4 (1.05)
8.4 (1.04)
8.2 (1.02)
8.0 (1.00)
7.2 (0.90)
8.0 (1.00)

11.0 (1.18)
10.8 (1.18)
10.2 (1.09)
8.4 (0.90)
6.9 (0.74)
9.3 (1.00)

Table 5c: Non-Farm Self-Employment by Quintile 1983-2004
% of working population self-employed in the non-farm sector (average “odds”)
1983

1987/8

1993/4

1999/00

2004/5

9.1 (0.83)
10.4 (0.95)
11.4 (1.04)
11.8 (1.07)
12.0 (1.10)
11.0 (1.00)

7.4 (0.73)
9.3 (0.92)
10.4 (1.03)
11.5 (1.14)
11.6 (1.15)
10.1 (1.00)

8.6 (0.73)
10.6 (0.89)
11.9 (1.00)
12.9 (1.08)
14.9 (1.25)
11.9 (1.00)

9.8 (0.77)
11.8 (0.92)
12.7 (1.00)
13.7 (1.08)
15.6 (1.22)
12.8 (1.00)

13.0 (0.87)
13.4 (0.90)
14.5 (0.97)
15.6 (1.05)
17.4 (1.17)
14.9 (1.00)

Notes: See notes to Tables 2 and 3 for group definitions, sample, and sources.

34

Table 6 Predicted Probabilities of Access to Occupations (evaluated at mean characteristics)
Nonfarm Nonfarm
Farm
selfNonfarm
Not
casual
Agricultural
employed regular working
labor
labor
Cultivator regular
1983
SC/ST
non SC/ST
Muslim
non Muslim
1987
SC/ST
non SC/ST
Muslim
non Muslim
1993
SC/ST
non SC/ST
Muslim
non Muslim
1999
SC/ST
non SC/ST
Muslim
non Muslim
2004
SC/ST
non SC/ST
Muslim
non Muslim

34.6
23.4
27.5
27.0

32.4
42.5
33.5
40.1

5.7
5.3
5.3
5.4

5.7
5.1
6.3
5.2

7.3
11.8
14.2
10.0

4.7
3.2
2.9
3.7

9.5
8.6
10.3
8.6

34.0
23.7
27.1
24.9

29.2
38.6
36.2
40.6

5.5
5.7
5.6
5.4

8.7
7.6
7.7
5.5

7.4
11.0
9.4
6.3

3.8
2.6
3.2
7.5

11.5
10.7
10.8
9.6

36.7
25.0
25.8
29.4

29.5
38.7
31.2
36.2

5.8
5.6
6.1
5.6

7.8
6.4
8.0
6.7

7.9
12.2
16.1
10.2

1.2
1.4
0.7
1.4

11.1
10.6
12.0
10.5

36.6
26.3
30.3
31.1

26.8
34.6
32.7
39.9

5.7
5.7
5.6
4.9

9.0
7.4
7.7
5.7

8.4
12.7
10.5
5.8

1.1
1.3
1.2
2.4

12.4
12.0
11.9
10.2

30.7
22.2
23.4
25.4

29.1
35.5
27.6
34.0

5.9
5.6
5.6
5.6

11.5
8.5
9.9
9.5

9.8
14.8
19.4
12.3

0.7
0.8
0.5
0.8

12.3
12.6
13.6
12.3

Notes: Employment probabilities are predicted after estimating multinomial logit model of 6 broad occupation
categories on individual’s characteristics such as age, educational status, and caste, and household’s
characteristics such as per capita land holdings and the number of household members. The regression results
are provided in Appendix. The probabilities for SC/ST (Scheduled castes and tribes), for example, are
predicted by assuming that the population belong to entirely SC/ST.

35

Table 7 Predicted Probabilities of Access to Occupations (evaluated at mean characteristics)
Nonfarm Nonfarm Nonfarm
Farm
selfregular
Not
casual
Agricultur
employed regular working
labor
labor
al labor
Cultivator
1983
Not literate
29.9
41.0
2.8
5.1
9.1
4.2
7.9
Primary completed
16.6
37.3
9.2
6.2
14.6
1.5
14.7
Secondary completed
4.5
23.9
29.1
1.4
9.9
0.5
30.7
University completed
1.5
13.4
43.3
0.6
8.2
0.3
32.8
1987
30.8
36.9
2.7
8.0
8.6
3.5
9.4
Not literate
16.9
35.3
9.1
7.9
13.9
1.4
15.5
Primary completed
6.0
24.4
25.4
3.6
10.4
0.5
29.6
Secondary completed
2.8
14.6
37.8
1.5
8.6
0.6
34.1
University completed
1993
33.2
37.8
2.6
6.8
9.6
1.6
8.4
Not literate
19.4
35.9
8.1
9.0
14.9
0.6
12.1
Primary completed
8.5
26.6
20.9
3.6
12.3
0.4
27.8
Secondary completed
3.0
15.0
37.0
0.6
10.5
0.5
33.5
University completed
1999
34.8
33.6
2.7
8.2
10.0
1.3
9.5
Not literate
20.5
32.2
8.2
10.3
14.7
1.1
13.0
Primary completed
9.7
26.7
17.6
5.2
13.9
0.7
26.1
Secondary completed
2.9
16.6
32.9
1.7
12.7
0.4
32.8
University completed
2004
19.0
35.7
7.9
10.4
16.0
0.5
10.5
Not literate
16.3
34.6
7.9
10.1
16.3
0.3
14.5
Primary completed
8.7
29.8
13.8
5.2
17.5
0.2
24.8
Secondary completed
4.0
16.3
30.1
2.1
19.0
0.4
28.2
University completed
Notes: See notes to Table 6.

36

Table 8a
Dependent variable: non-farm employment, overall and by type
State Fixed Effects
all nonfarm
Regular
Casual
manuf.
ln_yield
0.29
0.61
0.31
0.55
(2.94) **
(4.44) ***
(1.76) *
(3.12) ***
Year1993
0.04
-0.09
0.12
-0.17
(0.66)
(1.06)
(1.17)
(1.65) *
Year2004
0.21
-0.07
0.41
-0.1
(3.05) ***
(0.74)
(3.32) ***
(0.79)
Constant
2.44
-4.39
-3.93
-3.78
(14.44) *** (18.46) *** (12.91) *** (12.29) ***
Observations
173
173
173
172
R-squared
0.59
0.53
0.55
0.52
Absolute value of t statistics in parentheses
* significant at 10%; ** significant at 5%; *** significant at 1%

trade
0.25
(2.24) **
0.13
(2.03) **
0.52
(6.69) ***
-3.85
(20.08) ***
173
0.74

constr.
-0.11
(0.49)
0.20
(1.59)
1.07
(7.16) ***
-3.91
(10.57) ***
171
0.61

self-emp
0.07
(0.65)
0.04
(0.57)
0.27
(3.35) ***
-2.85
(14.34) ***
173
0.54

Dependent variable: non-farm employment, overall and by type
State Fixed Effects
all nonfarm
regular
Casual
manuf.
ln_yield
0.12
0.35
0.15
0.26
(1.18)
(2.32)**
(0.76)
(1.3)
ln_cwage_cnf
-0.09
-0.22
-0.13
-0.35
(0.97)
(1.54)
(0.7)
(1.84)*
ln_rmpce_urban
0.32
0.35
0.4
0.46
(2.46)**
(1.82)*
(1.56)
(1.80)*
ln_pcland
-0.09
-0.12
-0.13
-0.17
(2.14)**
(1.90)*
(1.54)
(1.97)*
Year1993
0
-0.13
0.17
-0.14
(0.07)
(1.42)
(1.33)
(1.07)
Year2004
0.12
-0.26
0.51
-0.14
(1.24)
(1.82)*
(2.64)***
(0.74)
ln_lowed
-0.3
-1.21
0.49
-0.92
(1.27)
(3.39)***
(1.02)
(1.94)*
Constant
-3.94
-5.78
-5.76
-5.45
(5.12)***
(5.04)***
(3.75)***
(3.55)***
Observations
172
172
172
172
R-squared
0.67
0.6
0.58
0.57
Absolute value of t statistics in parentheses
* significant at 10%; ** significant at 5%; *** significant at 1%

trade
0.13
(1.19)
-0.17
(1.61)
0.34
(2.39)**
-0.06
(1.25)
0.12
(1.69)*
0.46
(4.38)***
-0.28
(1.08)
-5.27
(6.31)***
172
0.81

constr.
-0.49
(1.96)*
0.29
(1.21)
0.92
(2.89)***
-0.08
(0.7)
0.06
(0.41)
0.76
(3.15)***
0.1
(0.17)
-9.56
(5.07)***
171
0.63

self-emp
-0.05
(0.47)
0.06
(0.56)
0.31
(2.14)**
-0.01
(0.2)
-0.08
(1.14)
0.02
(0.22)
-0.47
(1.75)*
-4.71
(5.41)***
172
0.62

37

Table 8b
Dependent variable: non-farm employment, overall and by type
Region-level Fixed Effects
all-nonfarm
regular
casual
manuf.
ln_yield
-0.38
-0.09
-0.42
-0.38
(2.40) **
(0.38)
(1.40)
(1.46)
Year1993
0.22
0.10
0.32
0.10
(3.94) ***
(1.26)
(3.00) ***
(1.09)
Year2004
0.51
0.25
0.74
0.35
(6.39) ***
(2.09) **
(4.83) ***
(2.61) ***
Constant
-1.32
-3.21
-2.70
-2.22
(4.94) ***
(8.11) ***
(5.28) ***
(5.02) ***
Observations
173
173
173
172
R-squared
0.86
0.82
0.82
0.87
Absolute value of t statistics in parentheses
* significant at 10%; ** significant at 5%; *** significant at 1%

trade
-0.18
(0.77)
0.25
(3.05) ***
0.71
(6.05) ***
-3.13
(7.98) ***
173
0.85

constr.
-0.38
(0.76)
0.28
(1.64)
1.20
(4.73) ***
-3.45
(4.11) ***
171
0.73

self-emp
-0.59
(2.76)***
0.22
(2.90) ***
0.57
(5.25) ***
-1.73
(4.77) ***
173
0.78

Dependent variable: non-farm employment, overall and by type
Region-level Fixed Effects
all-nonfarm
regular
casual
manuf.
ln_yield
-0.16
0.07
-0.22
-0.37
(1.1)
(0.28)
(0.73)
(1.41)
ln_cwage_cnf
0.04
0.09
-0.14
-0.2
(0.47)
(0.72)
(0.81)
(1.34)
ln_rmpce_urban
-0.05
-0.26
-0.06
-0.13
(0.4)
(1.26)
(0.23)
(0.55)
ln_pcland
-0.04
-0.13
-0.05
-0.12
(1.1)
(2.22)**
(0.59)
(1.80)*
year1993
0.12
-0.09
0.37
0.18
(1.79)*
(0.82)
(2.62)***
(1.5)
year2004
0.38
-0.08
0.91
0.52
(3.30)***
(0.44)
(3.73)***
(2.50)**
ln_lowed
0.07
-0.82
0.68
0.14
(0.31)
(2.29)**
(1.43)
(0.35)
Constant
-1.52
-2.5
-2.2
-1.07
(1.84)*
(1.88)*
(1.25)
(0.71)
Observations
172
172
172
172
R-squared
0.89
0.84
0.84
0.88
Absolute value of t statistics in parentheses
* significant at 10%; ** significant at 5%; *** significant at 1%

trade
0.22
(1.12)
-0.1
(0.91)
0.13
(0.75)
-0.05
(1.10)
0.12
(1.31)
0.51
(3.29)***
0.04
(0.13)
-4.34
(3.84)***
172
0.9

constr.
-0.52
(1.06)
0.51
(1.79)*
0.66
(1.47)
-0.1
(0.71)
0.08
(0.34)
0.84
(2.08)**
0.7
(0.92)
-8.55
(2.91)***
171
0.74

self-emp
-0.25
(1.32)
0.07
(0.62)
0.11
(0.69)
0
(0.09)
0.05
(0.54)
0.29
(1.98)**
0
(0.01)
-3.13
(2.92)***
172
0.83

38

Table 9: Correlates of Poverty Reduction Multivariate OLS

ln(real agricultural wages)
ln(yield)
ln(real urban mean per capita expenditure)
ln(land per capita)
1993 dummy
2004 dummy

ln(non-farm employment per adult population)
ln(non-farm employment share)*% with less
than primary education
ln(nonfarm regular non-farm employment
share)
ln(nonfarm regular non-farm employment
share)*% with less than primary education
Constant
Fixed Effects
Observations
R-Squared

(1)
-1.09
(8.02)***
-0.45
(3.36) ***
-0.31
(1.98) **
-0.14
(2.53) **
0.22
(3.02) ***
0.25
(2.40) **

ln(Regional Headcount Rate)
(1983, 1993 and 2004)
(2)
(3)
-0.7
-1.07
(3.88) ***
(8.14) ***
-0.47
-0.62
(3.56) ***
(2.81) ***
-0.34
-0.41
(2.19) **
(1.98) *
-0.12
-0.11
(2.26) **
(1.66) *
0.23
0.16
(3.15) ***
(1.58)
0.26
0.19
(2.59) **
(1.11)
-3.40
(2.27) **
3.87
(2.31) **

0.74
(2.07) **
-0.7
(1.78) *

4.61
(4.55) ***
State
171
0.81

Absolute value of t-statistics in parentheses
* significant at 10%, ** significant at 5% and *** significant at 1%

39

(4)
-0.69
(3.88) ***
-0.53
(2.48) ***
-0.37
(1.88) *
-0.13
(2.06) **
0.11
(1.08)
0.1
(0.62)

0.61
(2.94) ***
-0.5
(2.30) **
5.12
(5.22) ***
State
171
0.82

4.10
(2.90) ***
Region
171
0.89

-3.81
(3.09) ***
4.46
(3.21) ***
3.87
(2.80) ***
Region
171
0.89

Table 10a Marginal Incidence of Regular Non-Farm Employment in Rural India
Odds Ratio
Non-Farm Participation Average Odds Marginal
*
indicates
significantly
(
of Working Adults
Ratio
different from 1)
(percent)
1 (poorest)
0.035
0.38
0.53*
2
0.051
0.55
0.66*
3
0.070
0.75
0.71*
4
0.097
1.04
0.81
5 (richest)
0.174
1.87
0.84
Total
0.093
1.00
Source: Authors calculations based on the 2004 NSS Survey

Quintile

Table 10b Marginal Incidence of Casual Wage Non-Farm Employment in Rural
India
Odds Ratio
Non-Farm Participation Average Odds Marginal
*
indicates
significantly
(
of Working Adults
Ratio
different from 1)
(percent)
1 (poorest)
0.118
1.39
1.50*
2
0.110
1.30
1.54*
3
0.092
1.08
1.32*
4
0.074
0.87
1.18
5 (richest)
0.049
0.58
0.63*
Total
0.085
1.00
Source: Authors calculations based on the 2004 NSS Survey

Quintile

Table 10c Marginal Incidence of Non-Farm Self Employment in Rural India
Odds Ratio
Non-Farm Participation Average Odds Marginal
*
indicates
significantly
(
of Working Adults
Ratio
different from 1)
(percent)
1 (poorest)
0.191
0.97
0.88
2
0.190
0.96
0.86
3
0.200
1.02
1.13
4
0.199
1.01
1.08
5 (richest)
0.202
1.03
1.01
Total
0.197
1.00
Source: Authors calculations based on the 2004 NSS Survey

Quintile

40

Table 11: Correlates of Agricultural Wage Growth

ln(yield)
ln(real urban mean per capita expenditure)
ln(land per capita)
1993 dummy
2004 dummy

ln(non-farm employment per adult population)
ln(non-farm employment share)*% with less
than primary education
ln(nonfarm regular non-farm employment
share)
ln(nonfarm regular non-farm employment
share)*% with less than primary education
Constant
Fixed Effects
Observations
R-Squared

ln(Median Region-level Real Agricultural Wage Rate)
(1983, 1993 and 2004)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
0.30
0.14
0.10
0.31
(3.74) ***
(1.21)
(0.88)
(3.98) ***
0.01
0.04
-0.08
-0.06
(0.11)
(0.36)
(0.76)
(0.59)
0.05
0.04
0.01
0.03
(1.42)
(1.06)
(0.38)
(0.91)
0.30
0.34
0.36
0.29
(7.78) ***
(7.60) ***
(8.10) ***
(7.71) ***
0.48
0.57
0.59
0.46
(9.63) ***
(7.41) ***
(8.28) ***
(9.15) ***
-0.1
(0.46)
0.26
(1.10)

2.30
(3.90) ***
State
171
0.87

Absolute value of t-statistics in parentheses
* significant at 10%, ** significant at 5% and *** significant at 1%

41

1.37
(1.72) *
-1.52
(1.69) *
-0.14
(1.08)
0.20
(1.47)
2.02
(3.38) ***
State
171
0.87

2.98
(4.21) ***
Region
171
0.94

1.39
(2.09) **
-1.52
(2.01) **
3.14
(4.47) **
Region
171
0.94

Appendix Table 1: Employment Share among Economically Active Adult Population: 1983 –
2004/5
Total
Total
Nonfarm
Farm
Agricultural
Regular
Agricultural Nonfarm
SelfCasual
Labor
Cultivator Nonfarm Nonfarm Employed Regular
Sector
Sector

State
1983
All India
Andhra Pradesh
Assam
Bihar
Gujarat
Haryana
HP
Karnataka
Kerala
MP
Maharashtra
Orissa
Punjab
Rajasthan
Tamil Nadu
Uttar Pradesh
West Bengal
Jharkhand
Chattisgarh
Uttarakhand
1987
All India
Andhra Pradesh
Assam
Bihar
Gujarat
Haryana
HP
Karnataka
Kerala
MP
Maharashtra
Orissa
Punjab
Rajasthan
Tamil Nadu
Uttar Pradesh
West Bengal
Jharkhand
Chattisgarh
Uttarakhand

32.2
43.6
12.3
44.4
34.9
21.5
8.4
39.8
30.6
23.2
39.5
37.5
24.9
15.4
46.1
18.9
35.9
29.3
32.7
6.8

42.8
30.2
47.5
36.3
46.2
44.9
75.3
38.8
9.7
60.6
40.3
34.2
43.7
66.6
23.3
58.5
28.5
44.7
54.9
71.1

5.8
5.0
8.0
3.2
5.6
12.9
6.0
4.2
13.7
4.5
5.4
4.8
9.4
4.0
7.9
4.4
8.6
6.8
2.8
7.3

5.5
4.3
8.3
2.0
5.5
5.3
4.5
7.5
23.6
2.7
4.7
4.1
4.5
5.2
7.9
3.6
8.4
6.2
2.2
6.5

11.0
13.9
10.4
12.4
6.9
10.2
5.2
7.9
18.5
6.3
6.7
15.5
12.4
7.7
13.3
13.1
15.4
10.6
3.5
8.0

2.7
3.1
13.6
1.7
1.0
5.3
0.5
1.8
3.9
2.7
3.4
3.9
5.1
1.1
1.5
1.7
3.3
2.5
4.0
0.2

77.7
76.9
73.3
82.4
82.1
71.7
84.3
80.4
44.2
86.5
83.2
75.6
73.7
83.1
70.9
79.0
67.6
76.4
91.6
78.1

22.3
23.1
26.7
17.6
18.0
28.3
15.8
19.6
55.8
13.5
16.8
24.4
26.3
16.9
29.1
21.0
32.4
23.6
8.4
21.9

31.8
42.4
13.9
40.3
35.4
18.9
5.8
42.4
30.3
22.6
39.3
36.1
24.4
17.1
43.1
21.7
34.6
22.8
35.0
5.0

40.5
30.3
44.7
39.5
31.8
50.7
71.3
33.5
8.4
56.5
38.6
32.7
36.2
52.4
23.7
57.0
30.3
41.4
51.5
75.4

6.1
4.5
9.1
3.5
7.5
8.6
6.5
4.9
13.4
3.6
6.9
5.7
12.2
4.2
10.6
4.2
8.2
6.6
3.3
7.1

8.9
10.2
13.4
3.7
17.1
7.1
9.6
9.5
30.2
4.5
6.1
10.2
6.1
14.4
9.9
5.1
8.1
11.4
3.1
6.5

10.1
10.8
9.6
10.0
5.3
12.7
6.8
7.7
16.7
7.3
6.6
13.3
14.6
10.8
11.7
10.7
17.0
9.0
4.2
5.1

2.6
1.9
9.3
3.1
3.0
2.0
0.0
2.1
1.1
5.6
2.5
2.0
6.5
1.1
1.0
1.4
1.8
8.9
2.8
0.8

74.9
74.6
67.9
82.8
70.2
71.7
77.1
78.0
39.7
84.7
80.4
70.8
67.1
70.6
67.9
80.1
66.7
73.0
89.4
81.2

25.2
25.4
32.2
17.2
29.9
28.4
22.9
22.0
60.3
15.3
19.6
29.2
32.9
29.4
32.2
20.0
33.3
27.0
10.6
18.8

42

State
1993
All India
Andhra Pradesh
Assam
Bihar
Gujarat
Haryana
HP
Karnataka
Kerala
MP
Maharashtra
Orissa
Punjab
Rajasthan
Tamil Nadu
Uttar Pradesh
West Bengal
Jharkhand
Chattisgarh
Uttarakhand
1999
All India
Andhra Pradesh
Assam
Bihar
Gujarat
Haryana
HP
Karnataka
Kerala
MP
Maharashtra
Orissa
Punjab
Rajasthan
Tamil Nadu
Uttar Pradesh
West Bengal
Jharkhand
Chattisgarh
Uttarakhand

Nonfarm
Total
Total
Agricultural
Casual
Regular
SelfFarm
Agricultural Nonfarm
Labor
Cultivator Nonfarm Nonfarm Employed Regular
Sector
Sector
34.4
46.1
15.9
46.2
41.6
19.0
7.7
39.6
27.5
32.5
43.2
39.7
29.0
16.1
45.1
21.3
31.0
31.8
34.6
16.7

39.4
28.8
40.8
37.9
33.1
41.1
65.3
37.4
5.2
53.4
35.5
36.8
34.9
57.6
21.7
55.1
28.2
44.7
54.7
64.9

6.3
4.3
7.7
3.1
7.5
13.0
9.5
5.0
13.1
3.8
7.1
4.5
11.8
5.0
9.9
4.9
9.6
6.3
3.3
6.7

7.0
5.2
15.0
1.6
8.8
10.9
8.9
5.4
34.8
3.7
4.7
4.3
7.3
11.8
9.2
4.9
9.3
6.2
2.6
5.2

11.9
14.5
11.2
10.6
8.6
15.3
8.2
11.9
18.5
5.2
8.0
14.1
14.7
8.7
13.4
13.3
20.6
11.0
4.5
6.1

1.1
1.1
9.5
0.7
0.4
0.7
0.4
0.8
1.0
1.4
1.5
0.6
2.2
0.8
0.7
0.5
1.4
0.1
0.3
0.5

74.8
76.0
66.2
84.7
75.1
60.9
73.4
77.8
33.7
87.3
80.2
77.1
66.1
74.4
67.5
77.0
60.6
76.5
89.6
82.0

25.2
24.0
33.8
15.3
24.9
39.2
26.6
22.2
66.3
12.7
19.8
22.9
33.9
25.6
32.5
23.0
39.4
23.5
10.4
18.0

35.2
47.4
9.1
47.1
40.0
17.7
8.7
40.8
21.7
35.0
44.4
45.5
22.7
15.7
45.8
21.0
34.7
23.1
42.7
13.2

36.4
27.8
37.4
34.1
34.7
40.5
54.0
35.5
3.9
48.3
34.0
30.1
33.6
56.0
17.6
50.6
25.4
46.3
45.4
62.2

6.6
5.5
9.0
2.6
7.2
15.3
13.5
5.0
13.8
3.7
7.5
4.9
12.8
5.7
11.8
6.1
5.9
6.5
3.4
8.6

8.0
5.3
18.4
2.7
8.8
10.4
13.5
8.2
38.3
5.2
5.7
5.7
10.6
11.0
10.0
6.3
8.7
11.1
3.2
5.7

12.8
13.3
14.2
13.2
9.0
15.0
9.9
9.9
19.4
7.2
7.4
13.5
15.1
11.2
14.0
15.5
23.6
12.6
5.1
10.0

1.1
0.8
11.9
0.3
0.3
1.1
0.6
0.7
2.9
0.6
1.0
0.5
5.1
0.4
0.9
0.6
1.8
0.3
0.2
0.3

72.7
75.9
58.4
81.5
75.0
59.3
63.2
76.9
28.5
83.9
79.4
76.0
61.5
72.1
64.2
72.2
61.8
69.8
88.3
75.7

27.3
24.1
41.6
18.5
25.0
40.7
36.8
23.1
71.5
16.1
20.6
24.0
38.5
27.9
35.8
27.8
38.2
30.2
11.7
24.3

43

State
2004
All India
Andhra Pradesh
Assam
Bihar
Gujarat
Haryana
HP
Karnataka
Kerala
MP
Maharashtra
Orissa
Punjab
Rajasthan
Tamil Nadu
Uttar Pradesh
West Bengal
Jharkhand
Chattisgarh
Uttarakhand

Nonfarm
Total
Total
Agricultural
Casual
Regular
SelfFarm
Agricultural Nonfarm
Labor
Cultivator Nonfarm Nonfarm Employed Regular
Sector
Sector
30.1
43.2
10.0
35.9
39.2
20.5
8.2
45.4
17.7
29.9
39.0
31.2
22.1
14.1
41.5
15.3
30.8
11.7
38.4
16.4

37.6
25.7
50.4
39.1
34.0
30.6
53.6
33.0
3.6
49.8
37.7
31.9
27.4
53.7
20.6
50.9
25.9
53.4
46.1
56.1

7.2
6.6
6.0
2.9
8.1
17.2
14.9
5.1
18.0
4.9
7.9
6.4
17.5
6.4
10.6
6.6
6.6
4.7
4.1
8.8

9.3
7.2
12.9
3.1
8.1
11.7
12.7
7.3
36.5
5.8
5.0
9.1
15.0
13.1
12.5
8.8
10.4
16.0
5.5
6.3

14.9
16.5
15.8
18.9
10.3
18.5
10.4
9.0
22.9
8.9
9.4
21.1
16.1
12.5
14.5
18.0
24.2
14.1
5.8
11.9

0.8
0.9
4.9
0.1
0.4
1.4
0.2
0.2
1.3
0.7
1.0
0.3
1.9
0.2
0.3
0.4
2.2
0.1
0.2
0.5

68.5
69.7
65.3
75.1
73.5
52.6
62.0
78.6
22.6
80.5
77.7
63.4
51.5
68.0
62.4
66.6
58.8
65.2
84.7
73.1

31.5
30.3
34.7
24.9
26.5
47.4
38.0
21.4
77.4
19.5
22.3
36.6
48.5
32.0
37.6
33.4
41.2
34.8
15.4
26.9

Notes: Economically active adult population is defined as those who are between 15 and 60 years of age and engaged in work such as all the
market activities for pay or profits (except prostituted, begging, smuggling etc.) and non-market activities relating to the agricultural sector
for own consumption and construction of private or community facilities free of charge. Non-farm employment is defined as workers in
sectors other than agriculture by using industry code. Employment status is defined in NSS as following. Regular salaried employee is a
person who gets in return salary or wages on a regular basis but not on daily basis, casual wage labor is a person who earn wage according to
the terms of the daily or periodic work contract, and self-employed are persons who operate their own farm or non-farm enterprises.

44

Appendix Table 2: Descriptive Statistics for Male Adult Occupation Choice
1983

1987

1993

1999

2004

Age

32.86
(13.01)

32.67
(12.91)

32.81
(12.92)

32.89
(12.75)

33.18
(12.76)

Literate but below primary

0.13
(0.34)

0.14
(0.34)

0.14
(0.34)

0.12
(0.33)

0.12
(0.33)

Primary completed

0.15
(0.36)

0.15
(0.36)

0.14
(0.34)

0.13
(0.34)

0.16
(0.36)

Middle completed

0.13
(0.34)

0.14
(0.35)

0.16
(0.37)

0.19
(0.39)

0.20
(0.40)

Secondary completed

0.08
(0.27)

0.10
(0.30)

0.14
(0.35)

0.17
(0.37)

0.17
(0.38)

University completed

0.02
(0.12)

0.02
(0.14)

0.03
(0.17)

0.03
(0.18)

0.05
(0.22)

SC/ST

0.29
(0.45)

0.30
(0.46)

0.30
(0.46)

0.32
(0.47)

0.31
(0.46)

Muslim

0.08
(0.27)

1.09
(0.32)

0.09
(0.28)

1.09
(0.29)

0.10
(0.30)

Number of household members

5.30
(2.66)

5.37
(2.52)

5.15
(2.34)

5.29
(2.46)

4.95
(2.37)

Per capita land owned (ha.)

0.25
(1.15)

0.23
(0.58)

0.20
(0.46)

0.16
(0.38)

0.16
(0.38)

Number of observations

100346

108457

93279

95597

97184

Note: Numbers in the parentheses are standard deviation.

45

Appendix Table 3: Occupational Choice by Multinomial Logit Model in 1983
Not
working

Cultivator

Age

-0.597
(83.97)

0.022
(5.01)

0.175
(20.15)

0.014
(1.77)

0.029
(5.09)

-0.046
(4.96)

Age squared

0.008
(82.58)

0.000
(0.07)

-0.002
(15.18)

0.000
(3.14)

0.000
(1.20)

0.000
(2.58)

Literate but below primary

0.500
(9.88)

0.253
(9.32)

1.222
(22.30)

0.579
(13.48)

0.785
(23.15)

-0.260
(4.30)

Primary completed

1.577
(37.64)

0.564
(20.04)

1.970
(38.42)

0.822
(18.95)

1.155
(33.49)

-0.443
(6.43)

Middle completed

3.038
(67.64)

1.054
(28.87)

3.054
(55.79)

0.930
(16.17)

1.580
(36.19)

-1.052
(8.43)

Secondary completed

4.347
(63.26)

1.456
(22.80)

4.787
(66.67)

0.676
(5.89)

2.176
(30.88)

-0.159
(0.98)

University completed

5.465
(24.28)

1.861
(8.29)

6.303
(28.65)

0.867
(2.19)

3.095
(13.43)

0.342
(0.70)

SC/ST

-0.368
(11.42)

-0.799
(39.36)

-0.419
(11.16)

-0.285
(8.48)

-0.907
(31.84)

-0.030
(0.75)

Muslim

0.201
(4.00)

-0.266
(7.76)

-0.010
(0.17)

0.195
(3.76)

0.348
(9.12)

-0.309
(3.79)

0.118
(25.76)

0.157
(46.52)

0.019
(3.41)

0.024
(4.00)

0.072
(16.35)

0.039
(5.28)

Per capita land owned (ha.)

3.071
(50.53)

3.976
(74.47)

1.551
(19.15)

-1.770
(12.88)

-0.942
(10.31)

2.360
(26.54)

Constant

5.796
(52.91)

-1.962
(24.70)

-6.751
(42.06)

-1.779
(13.34)

-2.302
(21.94)

-1.392
(8.71)

Number of household
members

Number of observations
log likelihood
Pseudo R2

Nonfarm Nonfarm
Nonfarm
regular
casual
selfemployed

100346
131166.0
0.2027

Notes: Sample: Rural, Males, 15 to 60 years. Absolute value of z statistics in parentheses

46

Farm
regular

Appendix Table 4: Occupational Choice by Multinomial Logit Model in 1987
Not
working

Cultivator

Age

-0.600
(91.41)

0.018
(4.09)

0.183
(21.89)

0.001
(0.18)

0.101
(16.76)

-0.030
(3.03)

Age squared

0.008
(88.05)

0.000
(1.04)

-0.002
(16.65)

0.000
(2.89)

-0.001
(12.34)

0.000
(1.52)

Literate but below primary

0.483
(10.46)

0.419
(15.96)

1.330
(25.26)

0.460
(12.53)

0.793
(23.61)

-0.207
(3.30)

Primary completed

1.413
(36.69)

0.650
(23.78)

2.002
(40.17)

0.632
(16.95)

1.171
(34.48)

-0.342
(4.88)

Middle completed

2.624
(64.61)

1.065
(31.22)

2.934
(55.45)

0.842
(18.24)

1.549
(37.23)

-0.935
(7.80)

Secondary completed

3.724
(68.58)

1.334
(26.65)

4.401
(73.16)

0.910
(13.09)

2.002
(35.19)

-0.373
(2.51)

University completed

4.637
(33.03)

1.466
(10.49)

5.558
(40.47)

0.771
(3.65)

2.568
(17.50)

0.652
(2.30)

SC/ST

-0.357
(12.41)

-0.777
(39.18)

-0.542
(15.19)

-0.244
(8.81)

-0.821
(29.81)

-0.021
(0.51)

Muslim

0.054
(1.24)

-0.236
(7.41)

-0.013
(0.24)

0.244
(5.96)

0.326
(9.08)

-0.957
(9.17)

0.122
(27.33)

0.173
(50.04)

0.019
(3.27)

0.049
(9.61)

0.081
(17.92)

0.058
(7.29)

Per capita land owned (ha.)

2.523
(44.54)

3.609
(72.32)

0.941
(11.96)

0.216
(2.57)

-0.398
(4.90)

1.371
(12.95)

Constant

6.324
(55.52)

-1.853
(21.14)

-6.836
(40.90)

-1.627
(13.33)

-4.095
(34.42)

-0.907
(4.39)

Number of household
members

Number of observations
log likelihood
Pseudo R2

Nonfarm Nonfarm
Nonfarm
regular
casual
selfemployed

108385
146682.7
0.197

Notes: Sample: Rural, Males, 15 to 60 years. Absolute value of z statistics in parentheses

47

Farm
regular

Appendix Table 5: Occupational Choice by Multinomial Logit Model in 1993
Not
working

Cultivator

Age

-0.676
(86.81)

0.001
(0.13)

0.156
(17.53)

0.027
(3.82)

0.054
(8.92)

-0.015
(0.95)

Age squared

0.009
(82.77)

0.000
(4.40)

-0.001
(12.38)

-0.001
(5.41)

0.001
(6.18)

0.000
(0.59)

Literate but below primary

0.362
(6.56)

0.283
(9.89)

1.155
(19.09)

0.516
(12.70)

0.735
(20.90)

-0.190
(2.02)

Primary completed

1.176
(24.55)

0.574
(18.70)

1.833
(31.29)

0.853
(20.58)

1.067
(28.89)

-0.453
(3.87)

Middle completed

2.459
(55.41)

0.902
(27.36)

2.688
(47.92)

0.947
(20.69)

1.433
(36.76)

-0.302
(2.43)

Secondary completed

3.776
(73.09)

1.206
(28.18)

4.027
(68.81)

0.836
(12.97)

1.847
(38.10)

-0.046
(0.30)

University completed

5.071
38.26

1.560
(12.14)

5.646
(44.14)

0.041
(0.15)

2.727
(20.82)

1.254
(4.44)

SC/ST

-0.452
(14.04)

-0.838
(38.62)

-0.507
(13.42)

-0.210
(6.83)

-0.882
(30.88)

-0.591
(8.63)

Muslim

0.346
(6.79)

-0.050
(1.37)

0.308
(5.19)

0.331
(6.73)

0.628
(16.36)

-0.602
(4.17)

0.131
(24.30)

0.198
(48.33)

0.027
(3.98)

0.032
(5.00)

0.105
(20.87)

0.019
(1.37)

Per capita land owned (ha.)

4.224
(55.04)

5.487
(79.43)

2.594
(26.80)

-0.356
(2.73)

0.695
(7.09)

2.645
(14.38)

Constant

7.105
(59.80)

-2.131
(24.55)

-6.848
(40.81)

-2.014
(15.81)

-3.017
(27.21)

-2.799
(10.19)

Number of household
members

Number of observations
log likelihood
Pseudo R2

Nonfarm Nonfarm
Nonfarm
regular
casual
selfemployed

93274
119085.6
0.225

Notes: Sample: Rural, Males, 15 to 60 years. Absolute value of z statistics in parentheses

48

Farm
regular

Appendix Table 6: Occupational Choice by Multinomial Logit Model in 1999
Not
working

Cultivator

Age

-0.689
(94.81)

0.012
(2.41)

0.095
(11.24)

0.041
(5.90)

0.077
(12.61)

0.055
(3.28)

Age squared

0.009
(90.71)

0.000
(2.43)

-0.001
(5.71)

-0.001
(7.88)

-0.001
(9.43)

-0.001
(3.14)

Literate but below primary

0.390
(7.37)

0.277
(9.27)

1.188
(18.45)

0.478
(12.16)

0.629
(17.40)

0.120
(1.23)

Primary completed

1.069
(23.12)

0.571
(18.44)

1.836
(30.01)

0.795
(20.12)

0.998
(27.11)

0.406
(4.21)

Middle completed

2.047
(49.33)

0.874
(28.74)

2.704
(48.50)

0.964
(24.46)

1.323
(36.58)

0.224
(2.11)

Secondary completed

3.363
(72.53)

1.254
(33.96)

3.895
(68.95)

0.951
(18.77)

1.838
(44.09)

0.670
(5.79)

University completed

4.958
(42.25)

1.909
(16.99)

5.739
(49.75)

0.998
(5.90)

2.959
(25.94)

1.385
(5.00)

SC/ST

-0.391
(13.28)

-0.749
(34.93)

-0.489
(13.86)

-0.142
(5.02)

-0.813
(29.79)

-0.507
(7.33)

Muslim

0.249
(5.36)

-0.242
(6.66)

0.222
(3.98)

0.357
(8.12)

0.626
(17.31)

-0.647
(4.54)

0.096
(20.02)

0.172
(46.09)

0.012
(2.01)

0.018
(3.25)

0.087
(19.36)

0.045
(3.50)

4.135
(48.35)

5.879
(76.53)

2.597
(24.19)

-1.630
10.69

0.719
(6.67)

0.756
(2.64)

7.554
60.42

-2.119
(21.37)

-6.095
(35.23)

-2.323
(17.46)

-4.034
(33.30)

-3.700
(10.75)

Number of household
members
Per capita land owned (ha.)
Constant

Number of observations
log likelihood
Pseudo R2

Nonfarm Nonfarm
Nonfarm
regular
casual
selfemployed

95597
126288.2
0.212

Notes: Sample: Rural, Males, 15 to 60 years. Absolute value of z statistics in parentheses

49

Farm
regular

Appendix Table 7: Occupational Choice by Multinomial Logit Model in 2004

Age
Age squared
Literate but below primary
Primary completed
Middle completed
Secondary completed
University completed
SC/ST
Muslim
Number of household
members
Per capita land owned (ha.)
Constant

Number of observations
log likelihood
Pseudo R2

Not
working
-0.729
(94.29)
0.009
(89.12)
0.006
(0.11)
0.576
(11.98)
1.552
(35.28)
3.127
(62.94)
4.089
(43.77)
-0.441
(14.36)
0.228
(4.93)

Cultivator
0.025
(5.05)
0.000
(0.15)
0.231
(7.52)
0.532
(17.89)
0.749
(24.92)
1.254
(32.39)
1.279
(14.86)
-0.66
(30.29)
-0.186
(5.25)

0.109
(20.49)
3.972
(45.20)
8.764
(72.27)

0.184
(45.16)
5.869
(75.22)
-2.529
(26.94)

Nonfarm Nonfarm
Nonfarm
regular
casual
selfemployed
0.043
0.020
0.086
(5.26)
(3.05)
(14.31)
0.000
0.000
-0.001
(1.38)
(5.36)
(11.22)
0.885
0.205
0.566
(13.23)
(5.33)
(15.73)
1.602
0.430
0.839
(26.97)
(11.68)
(23.98)
2.262
0.633
1.180
(40.41)
(17.11)
(33.96)
3.454
0.594
1.875
(58.61)
(11.37)
(44.17)
4.992
0.450
2.732
(54.54)
(3.48)
(32.19)
-0.404
-0.026
-0.799
(11.56)
(0.96)
(30.14)
0.130
0.138
0.567
(2.32)
(3.18)
(16.16)
0.065
(10.58)
2.696
(25.87)
-4.736
(30.65)

0.048
(8.88)
-0.789
(6.01)
-1.387
(11.86)

97184
129110.6
0.212

Notes: Sample: Rural, Males, 15 to 60 years. Absolute value of z statistics in parentheses

50

0.116
(24.91)
0.552
(5.36)
-3.403
(30.53)

Farm
regular
-0.061
(3.01)
0.001
(2.88)
-0.461
(3.37)
-0.253
(2.00)
-0.521
(3.60)
-0.119
(0.68)
1.188
(5.09)
-0.430
(4.78)
-0.477
(2.82)
0.048
(2.73)
2.965
(11.50)
-2.702
(7.29)

